Foreign     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 3, 
January 18, 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Latin America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   ALBANIA 

   RUBIK COPPER-PROCESSING ENTERPRISE:  In addition to the Copper- 
Smelting Establishment in Rubik, the Copper-Processing Enterprise is 
expected to begin production soon, Engineer Sefer Nika told an ATA 
reporter.  The operation of this plant becomes necessary because 
cathodic copper with 99.96 percent copper and different types of 
bronze are in great demand on foreign markets.  It is worth pointing 
out that the copper plant was not robbed and misused during the 
transition period.  The plant's technology and equipment were not 
even damaged by frequent suspensions of production.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1123 GMT 24 Dec 93 AU) 

   DUTCH GROUP'S AID TO HOMES FOR ELDERLY:  The Dutch Humanitarian 
Association "Osteuropa Zendings" will provide investments to improve 
the living conditions in houses for the elderly in Fier and Shkoder. 
Besides financing for the installation of central heating and the 
painting of the buildings, this association will also provide 
facilities for the kitchens, bathrooms, lavatories, and wash basins. 
A Dutch couple will come to Albania to train the staffs of both 
institutions.  They will stay for one year at the Fier house. 
During their stay in Albania, the Dutch couple will also deal with 
the problems of psychotherapy for the old people.  Rezarta Shehu, 
specialist at the Ministry of Labor and Social Assistance, told ATA 
that the representatives of the Dutch Association took interest in, 
and expressed their readiness to help, the Orphanage of Shkoder for 
3-6 year-old children.  (Tirana ATA in English 1110 GMT 26 Dec 93 
AU) 

   ALBANIAN TELECOM PLANS MAJOR PROJECTS FOR 1994:  At present, 
Albania is in great need of telecommunications, the Telecom director 
told an ATA reporter.  The EBRD, the Swiss Government, the European 
Community, the Albanian Government, and other organizations have 
supported the development of Albanian Telecom.  Dozens of big 
companies that have provided Telecom with new technology have 
competed for different projects.  During 1993, 6,000 subscribers 
were added to the national telephone network of Kavaje, Berat, 
Vlore, Tirana, and other cities, compared to a total of 30,000 in 
the existing network.  The extension of the telephone network in the 
countryside is one of the targets of Albanian Telecom for 1994, 
considering the requests of new Albanian farmers and a lot of 
clients who can afford to pay large sums of money. 

   "The Albanian telephone network is the crossroads of European 
telephone lines, north-south and west-east," Mr. Shehu said and 
reported the inauguration of an Italy-Albania-Macedonia radio line 
and the first inter-Balkan telecommunication agreement, the 
establishment of a Tirana-Skopje-Sofia telephone network.  One of 
the Telecom targets is to establish the Greece-Elania-Germany 
telephone network.  Computers will be installed in the Telecom in 
1994 and, in the future, the network will make possible the 
transmission of signals from one city to the other.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1805 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   'TRANS-BALKAN' TELEPHONE SYSTEM INAUGURATED:  A new telephone 
system, "The Trans-Balkan Lines," has been established to improve 
telecommunication between Italy, Albania, Macedonia, Bulgaria, and 
Turkey.  On the occasion of inaugurating the system, Mr. Adrian 
Shehu, director of the Albanian Telecom Department, said that the 
system will also be part of a wider network of east-west 
communications traffic.  The first stage of the realization of this 
project was the inauguration of 300 telephone lines from Italy, 
Albania, Macedonia, Bulgaria, and Turkey.  The Italian company 
Tritel participated in the project by providing the necessary 
equipment.  Mr. Shehu said that the technical staffs of the Albanian 
and Macedonian Telecoms and the Italian company Sirti have also 
taken part in this undertaking.  The second stage of the project 
will be the installation of fiber-optical cables in these countries. 
The total cost of the project will amount to $24 million.  Each 
country will carry out the work and own that part of the system 
within its borders.  The participating states will conclude 
bilateral agreements governing the operation system.  Mr. Shehu said 
that they are drafting the "Adria 1" project for another telephone 
system, which will cover Germany, Croatia, Albania, and Greece. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1105 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   NUMBER OF FREIGHTER PASSENGERS DOUBLES:  The number of passengers 
who travel by freighter from Italy, Slovenia, and Croatia to the 
port of Durres has doubled on the eve of the New Year.  At the Naval 
Agency, an ATA reporter was told that the influx of Albanian 
passengers in the last two weeks has increased from 500 to 1,000 per 
freighter.  There are five ferry boats that run their service for 
the Albadria, Shpresa, and Italmar Agencies.  Over 60 percent of the 
Albanians who return to celebrate the New Year with their families 
come with cars, buses, or trucks, which are of a higher quality that 
those that were brought some months ago.  The reporter was also told 
that many Albanians of Macedonia and Kosova, employed in various 
countries of Europe, have returned home through the port of Durres. 
(Tirana ATA in English 0919 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   GROWING PRIVATE SECTOR:  Skeptics who predicted a gloomy year for 
the Albanian market are now facing concrete facts.  Polls and 
official statistics show that over 150 Albanian joint ventures with 
foreign partners are functioning throughout the country.  Private 
trade units count for over 52,000, without mentioning here the 
thousands of other Albanian private firms that deal with the export 
and import of commodities.  The former ration tickets for 1 kg of 
meat, one chicken, or one turkey are now only memories.  However, 
miracles cannot occur in only two years.  Foreign experts have 
confirmed that, since March 1992, Albania is progressing faster with 
its economic reforms than any other eastern European country. 
(Tirana ATA in English 0917 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   MACEDONIAN TRANSPORTATION MINISTRY DISCUSSES PROTOCOL: 
Delegations of the Albanian Ministry of Transportation, led by 
Deputy Minister Sopot Haci, and the Macedonian Ministry of 
Transportation, led by Deputy Minister Jorgo Shundovski, met in 
Skopje on 21 December to discuss the prolongation of the term of the 
protocol on motor road transportation between Albania and Macedonia 
until 30 June 1994.  During this time, both countries are planning 
to sign an agreement on international passengers and goods 
transportation.  (Tirana ATA in English 0912 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   GREEK EQUIPMENT FOR ELECTRICITY SYSTEM:  The Greek Electroenergy 
Corporation has provided 69 transformers and seven tons of electric 
cable for the Albanian electric system.  All equipment has already 
arrived in Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 1105 GMT 29 Dec 93 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY CENTER IN DURRES:  The private center 
Agrivelka Shqiptare was established in the territory of the former 
Agricultural Mechanical Enterprise in Durres, a coastal city in the 
most important western lowland area.  The center will provide 
services for the Italian technology and for Fiat Avil, which has 
already been introduced into Albania, will supply Albanian private 
farmers with agricultural technology, and will accomplish various 
qualifications.  It will cooperate with the Italian firm "New 
Holland Fiat," which has provided tractors and other agricultural 
machinery as part of the credit of the EC PHARE project for 
agriculture.  Mr. Elio Germano, EC ambassador, and Mr. Paolo 
Foresti, Italian ambassador to Albania, were present at the 
inauguration of Agrivelka center.  (Tirana ATA in English 1126 GMT 
18 Dec 93 AU) 

   U.S. FIRM TO FINANCE MODERNIZATION OF FERROCHROMIUM PLANT:  Work 
to reconstruct the first furnace in the Burrel Ferro-Chromium Plant 
has already started.  Due to old technology, the plant could not 
upgrade chrome concentrate.  So far, the concentrate has been 
exported at unfavorable prices unable to cover even the costs of 
production.  The U.S. firm Huxly Barter Cooperation has undertaken 
to reconstruct the ferro-chromium furnace by allocating about $1 
million for this purpose.  The firm had previously contracted the 
purchase of ferro-chromium.  The modernization of this plant is 
expected to be completed by the end of March next year.  (Tirana ATA 
in English 1118 GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   FIRST PRIVATE ELECTRIC SERVICE COMPANY:  Nurka is the first 
private electric service company, established in Sarande three 
months ago.  Nurka carries out electric services for state 
enterprises and private owners.  So far, it has completed all 
installations in electric cabins in Borsh, Sarande, and Delvine, and 
has renovated the water reservoirs in Cuke and Vrine.  Nurka is 
receiving more and more requests from private owners in the city and 
countryside.  Engineer Bujar Nurka is the boss of the company.  He 
worked in a private electric company in Greece for two years and 
upon his return from Greece, he decided to run the company.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1126 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   PRIVATE BAKERIES PRODUCING 75 PERCENT OF COUNTRY'S BREAD:  Over 
the last 20 months, the structure of supplying the population with 
food has changed in Albania.  During this period the state has 
imported 60 bakeries, while over 32 electric bakeries have been 
equipped with contemporary technology at home.  During this period, 
private firms have brought into Albania nearly 300 bakeries with a 
capacity of five tons in 24 hours.  The furnaces meet all the 
country's needs.  On a country scale, 75 percent of the needs for 
bread are met by private bakeries, which function in all city 
quarters and villages.  The state bread production sector is 
undergoing privatization as well, but only 60-70 percent of this 
sector has been privatized so far.  (Tirana ATA in English 0914 GMT 
20 Dec 93 AU) 

   IMPACT OF FOREIGN AID, EMIGRANTS' REMITTANCES:  The 19 December 
issue of GAZETA SHQIPTARE reports that during the past year local 
purchasing power has been significantly increased by approximately 
$500 million received from Albanian emigrants abroad.  At the same 
time, the value of goods brought into Albania by emigrants during 
1993 was about 600 million new leks, nearly $6 million.  Foreign aid 
accorded to Albania during the first ten months of 1993 amounted to 
2.391 billion leks.  Exports were another important source of 
revenue.  During the first nine months this year the profit amounted 
to approximately 6 billion, 775 million leks.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1132 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   CABINET TO SET UP ENVIRONMENTAL AGENCIES, LABOR INSPECTORATE:  At 
its 20 December meeting, the Council of Ministers agreed to reduce 
the price of fruits, olive trees, and vineyards owned by state 
agricultural enterprises with the intention of stepping up the 
privatization of the state farms.  The Council of Ministers also 
decided to establish regional agencies for protecting the 
environment in prefectures with a view of expanding the information 
system and environmental control and to set up a labor inspectorate 
to control application of Labor Code and implement decisions 
regarding safety measures for workers employed in private sector. 
The new measure will define the rights, duties and other 
responsibilities of labor inspectors.  This measure fills an 
institutional gap existing in the labor field.  The cabinet decided 
to authorize the Ministry of Transportation and Communication to 
grant licenses for carrying out activities in these fields.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1129 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   U.S. FARMERS' GROUP TO AID DAIRY SECTOR:  The U.S. Private 
Farmers Association "Land O' Lakes" has drafted a program to assist 
Albanian farmers to increase milk production and processing.  The 
association's program "Campaign To Improve the Milk Sector" aims to 
provide training and information to 4,000 Albanian dairy women.  Its 
director, Rebecca Balough, states that the program will last till 
December 1944, and, if it proves to be successful, it will be used 
as a model for other former communist countries in eastern Europe. 
The data provided by the Ministry of Agriculture and Food confirms 
that, in 1990, there were 550 dairy enterprises in Albania.  In 
1992, 40,000 tons of milk were processed for consumption.  Following 
the disintegration of the state agricultural enterprises, 98.5 
percent of dairy barns were privatized, resulting in a net increase 
per capita of milk production.  In 1992, milk production was 205 kg 
per capita, and it is expected to grow to 300 kg per capita per 
year.  (Tirana ATA in English 1320 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   BABY FOOD FACTORY TO BE SET UP IN TIRANA:  Mr. Mustafa Demneri, 
chief of the Department of Trade, Food, and Hotel Industries in 
Tirana Municipality, reports that a baby food factory will be set up 
in Tirana in 1994.  The European Union will contribute 80 million 
leks to the project to be channeled through the Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food.  The Tirana Municipality will provide the 
construction site alongside with its efforts to stimulate the 
production of macaroni, chocolates, wines and the creation of 
wholesale markets in Tirana suburbs.  Food markets will also be 
built by former persecutees and owners.  The Tirana Municipality 
also plans to create touristic centers in Kavaje, a coastal area, 
and Dajti mountain.  (Tirana ATA in English 1126 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   BULGARIA 

   BRITISH GAS REPORTEDLY FINDS GAS DEPOSIT:  Bulgarian dailies 
reported on 22 December that British Gas had discovered a natural 
gas deposit not far from the mouth of the Kamchiya River.  The 
deposit is expected to be richer than the one discovered by Texaco 
off Cape Galata near Varna.  DUMA reported that the British Gas 
press center denied being the source of the report, and cited Ivan 
Batandzhiev, chairman of the Committee on Geology, who said 
information on the British Gas drilling operations would be 
available around or after Christmas.  (Sofia BTA in English 1139 GMT 
22 Dec 93 AU) 

   STATE RAILWAYS TO CUT PASSENGER SERVICES:  As of 9 January 1994, 
the Bulgarian State Railways (BDZh) will cut 49 passenger train 
services to save costs, Deputy Transport Minister Kharalan 
Kharalanov announced on 21 December.  Kharalanov, who is also 
chairman of the BDZh Board of Directors,  also said that the BDZh 
will reduce the number of railcars in its trains, thus removing 
26,239 seats.  This measure will permit 150 railcars built in 1968 
to be withdrawn from service.  (Sofia KONTINENT in Bulgarian 22 Dec 
93 p 2 AU) 

   DAILY CLAIMS NATIONAL BANK TO SELL GOLD:  On 23 December the TRUD 
daily quoted financiers as saying the Bulgarian National Bank (BNB) 
may sell up to 20 tons of Bulgaria's gold reserves next year to 
raise money for payments to Bulgaria's private creditors and for 
other foreign debt service payments.  BNB Governor Todor Vulchev 
denied the statement.  TRUD quotes him as saying Bulgaria may use 
gold as a security for soft-term loans.  (Sofia BTA in English 1003 
GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   EBRD TO FINANCE INDUSTRIAL PARK:  The European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) has agreed to lend ECU 10 
million for the building of an industrial park in Bulgaria, Irena 
Komitova, managing director of the Euro Info Correspondence Center 
(EIC) of the Union for Private Economic Enterprise (UPEE), told BTA, 
quoting a letter to the EIC.  Greek and German partners of the EIC 
will finance the project with a further ECU 10 million. 

   The park will be housed in a specially built structure, in which 
a dozen or so Bulgarian companies will be allocated warehouses and 
production premises.  Infrastructure will be provided for some other 
services, such as financial management, office services, printing 
and mail, Mrs. Komitova said.  The main idea is that Bulgarian, 
Greek, and joint ventures be supported in the first two years of 
their operation. 

   High-tech companies are also expected to work in the Bulgarian 
industrial park, as Bulgaria is well known for its specialists, 
particularly in software.  The companies will not only be able to 
use the available infrastructure and information, but they can also 
buy the offices and the storerooms on easy terms, she added.  She 
said the idea came from a Greek-German group of internationally 
active business consulting firms.  The project's extended final 
version for about ECU 20 million will be submitted to the EBRD by 
the end of January, following its discussion with the Greek-German 
partner group.  A joint venture is envisaged as a joint-stock 
company to manage the industrial center. 

   The Euro Info Correspondence Center holds the exclusive rights to 
liaise between small and medium-sized Bulgarian businesses and the 
European Commission, Mrs. Komitova said.  Its main concern is the 
development of research projects at a macro level and support of new 
private enterprises at the micro level.  The center provides a 
number of specialized services such as legal advice, financial and 
marketing services, etc.  The network of information centers of the 
European Commission is intended to encourage the development of 
small and medium-sized enterprises in the European Union countries 
in the period before the single market is launched, Komitova 
recalled.  (Sofia BTA in English 1705 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   NEW INVESTMENT BANK SET UP:  The newly established Bulgarian 
Investment Bank (BIB) will help and finance the private sector.  The 
bank's capital is 200 million leva, and the major block of shares 
(35 percent) is held by the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD).  According to the business daily PARI, the other 
foreign stockholders are Global Finance of Greece (14 percent) and 
Cholmeoly Trustees of Great Britain (11 percent).  The Bulgarian 
stockholders are United Bulgarian Bank and Elektronika Bank (10 
percent), Touristsportbank, Balkanbank and Hebrobank (5 percent), 
and Penyo Khadzhiev (5 percent).  Khadzhiev is a private 
businessman, former executive director of the Bank Consolidation 
Company, and a major shareholder of the private oil company Elpida 
(5 percent). 

   According to the BIB's articles, the bank will have a nine-member 
board of directors.  PARI writes that Penyo Khadzhiev is one of the 
three executive directors, and the other two will be foreigners. 

   The EBRD participation as shareholder in the BIB is its first 
direct investment in Bulgaria, the EBRD has so far financed only 
projects, Stiliyan Vutev, executive director of United Bulgarian 
Bank, says.  According to finance experts, in five or 10 years the 
EBRD will probably sell its BIB shares.  (Sofia BTA in English 1747 
GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   TRADE WITH SOUTH KOREA:  Bulgaria's trade with the Republic of 
Korea has constantly expanded over the past few years.  A great 
number of Bulgarian businessmen have visited the Republic of Korea. 
Executives of small and medium-sized South Korean enterprises 
recently paid a visit to Bulgaria, says Kye Yong-Sang, director of 
KOTRA, the Republic of Korea's Trade Center in Sofia, in an 
interview in DEMOKRATSIYA.  The center was inaugurated in April 
1989.  Four years after the establishment of formal economic 
relations between the two countries, cooperation in science and 
technology has flourished, Mr. Kye adds.  Several South Korean 
companies already sell well on the Bulgarian market.  These include 
Goldstar, Samsung, and Daewoo.  (Sofia BTA in English 1241 GMT 24 
Dec 93 AU) 

   SHIRTS MARKETED ABROAD:  The Vida Stil Tailoring Company will sew 
860,000 shirts on consignment to the London Dewars Company next 
year.  The products will be marketed by the famous Marks and Spencer 
Trading House.  Under the framework agreement between the two sides, 
the London company will provide its Bulgarian partners with 
equipment to the value of $150,000 for the production of 400,000 
sportswear items next year.  Vida Stil has another 600,000-shirt 
consignment ordered by the German firm of Orbis, its oldest partner. 
Another 759,000 shirts will be made for a Belgian company.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1851 GMT 26 Dec 93 AU) 

   BULGARIAN-SWISS TOURIST ASSOCIATION FOUNDED:  A Bulgarian-Swiss 
Tourist Association was set up in Gabrovo (northern Bulgaria). 
Together with its activity in tourism, the organization will help 
launch major projects in agriculture and the health services system. 
The Inter Assist Fund will represent the Swiss side in the 
implementation of the initiative.  (Sofia BTA in English 1851 GMT 26 
Dec 93 AU) 

   SERBIAN COMPANY ACQUIRES VESSELS:  The Kladovo Shipyard, Serbia, 
is the new owner of the seven vessels auctioned off by Bulgarian 
River Lines.  The Serb company spent a total of 4.27 million leva on 
one tugboat, three passenger ships, and two barges.  The Serbian 
Company Director Blagoe Bogdanovic said the two barges will probably 
enter the river fleet sailing the Serb section of the Danube while 
the destination of the others is not yet decided.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1851 GMT 26 Dec 93 AU) 

   JAPANESE COMPANIES STUDY ERMA RIVER THERMAL WATER:  To study the 
ground thermal waters under the Erma River was the key purpose of 
representatives of Japanese firms headed by Kazumasa Shibuta, 
attache in charge of economic affairs at the Japanese Embassy here, 
who visited Zlatograd (southern Bulgaria) last week.  Meeting with 
Mitko Angelov, executive director of the local branch of the Ore 
Mining Gorubso Company, the Japanese guests discussed projects for 
joint activity.  According to the visiting businessmen, the 
development of ore mining in the region can combine with efficient 
use of the ground thermal waters that the area boasts.  A final 
decision on whether or not Japanese companies will invest in a joint 
project will be taken by mid-January.  (Sofia BTA in English 1851 
GMT 26 Dec 93 AU) 

   DAEWOO NEGOTIATES WITH FIRST PRIVATE BANK:  At their annual 
general meeting held a week ago, the shareholders of First Private 
Bank (FPB) voted in favor of continued negotiations with the South 
Korean Daewoo Group, which is bidding to buy a 49-percent stake in 
the bank.  Daewoo will be sold a new share issue of registered and 
voting stock.  The issue will bring the FPB's authorized capital to 
1 billion leva.  The bank was incorporated in April 1990 with a 
wholly privately owned nominal capital of 10 million leva.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1419 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   SUGAR-BEET GROWERS IN CRISIS:  Bulgaria had 9,000 hectares under 
sugar beet in 1993, down from 18,800 hectares.  Sugar output this 
year is projected at 6-7,000 tons, as compared with 28,000 tons in 
1992.  These figures were announced on 28 December at the annual 
meeting of the Academic Council of the Prof. Ivan Ivanov Sugar Beet 
Institute near Shumen.  According to experts, Bulgaria's sugar beet 
production may hit bottom next year.  The Academic Council proposed 
that the public, the cabinet and parliament be acquainted with the 
grave problems of sugar-beet growers.  (Sofia BTA in English 2026 
GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT PROMISES IMF LOWER INFLATION IN 1994:  In a letter 
sent to the IMF, the government and the Bulgarian National Bank 
(BNB) promised that domestic inflation will fall to 30 percent in 
1994.  The document, outlining the government's economic intentions 
for 1994, was signed this week by Finance Minister Stoyan 
Aleksandrov and BNB Governor Todor Vulchev.  If the IMF approves it, 
Bulgaria will receive loans.  The letter promises that monthly 
retail price rises will be held to 2 percent and the budget deficit 
will be kept within 6.2 percent of the GDP.  It also predicts that 
interest rates will fall almost to the annual inflation rate of 30 
percent, and that, by the end of 1994, interest rates will be 
positive, i.e. higher than price inflation.  The letter also states 
that bank loans will be strictly limited in 1994 and that the BNB 
will continue its present policy of imposing credit ceilings.  If 
the IMF accepts the government's letter of intent, Bulgaria may 
expect to receive loans of about $1 billion in 1994.  (Sofia 24 
CHASA in Bulgarian 13 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   BUSINESS CONSULTING CENTER OPENS IN SOFIA:  The Bulgarian 
Industrial Association opened a Business Consultancy Center (BCC) in 
Sofia on 16 December.  The center will provide information about 
privatization, investment, banking, insurance, real estate, 
exchanges, and tourism and will offer legal advice.  "This is a new 
business consultancy firm set up in partnership with state and 
private institutions specialized in certain fields," Branimir 
Khandzhiev, the center's executive director, told BTA.  Sessions 
will be held in the provinces, inviting foreign consultants to some 
of them, and the center will also draw on foreign experience.  The 
BCC will establish direct contacts with over 3,000 private and state 
companies and enterprises affiliated to the Bulgarian Industrial 
Association.  All interested economic organizations, private 
persons, and foreign customers can use the center's services. 
Customers will be serviced by experts of the Bulgarian Industrial 
Association, the Privatization Agency, the Sofia City Privatization 
Agency, the Ministries of Trade, Industry, Transport, and 
Construction, the Committee on Tourism, and insurance, banking and 
other specialized institutions.  It will hold sessions every 
Thursday.  (Sofia BTA in English 1122 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   RETAIL FOOD PRICES RISE:  The retail prices of the goods 
controlled by the government went up 0.74 percent between 30 
November and 15 December, the National Statistical Institute 
announced.  The steepest rise was in the prices of milk -- 3.78 
percent, and yoghurt -- 3.74 percent.  Pork and chicken cost less. 
(Sofia BTA in English 2204 GMT 15 Dec 93 AU) 

   UNION FOR PRIVATE ECONOMIC ENTERPRISE:  In the four years since 
it was set up, the Union for Private Economic Enterprise (UPEE) has 
built structures that have become an integral part of the Bulgarian 
economy, Valentin Mollov, UPEE chairman and head of the Mollov 
Financial Group, said at a press conference in Sofia on 16 December. 
As examples, he listed the UPEE's European Information Center (Euro 
Info Correspondence Center-BG-681), the First Private Bank, the 168 
Hours Press Group, and the Bulgaria Insurance and Reinsurance 
Company.  UPEE was set up on 22 December 1989 as the first nonprofit 
organization that set out to support the first steps of private 
enterprise. 

   The union has now become the largest organization of private 
entrepreneurs.  About 10,000 companies grouped in 50 regional units 
throughout the country are now members of the union, Mollov said. 
This May, he said, the EC approved the Union's Euro Office as a 
representative correspondence center of the European network of EC 
information units.  UPEE has contacts mostly with Bulgaria's 
neighbors, Mollov said, adding that Greece, Romania, and Serbia are 
its most active partners.  The union is trying to maintain 
traditional contacts with the Eastern European countries, including 
those of the former USSR, he added.  The European Information Center 
is drawing up projects with U.S. and Greek companies.  The European 
Bank for Reconstruction and Development is expected to extend ECU 20 
million to finance a large part of a project for a park-incubator 
for small and medium-sized companies, Mollov told journalists after 
the news conference.  UPEE has created over 40,000 jobs in the 
country, Mollov claimed.  He sees as a major achievement a small and 
medium-sized businesses bill introduced by the union in the National 
Assembly.  Such a law would help breed a middle class in this 
country and create new jobs, Mollov added.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1752 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   PROBLEMS WITH NATURAL GAS SUPPLY:  On 16 December, Ivan Kolev, 
chief of the Countries in Transition to a Market Economy Department 
at the Ministry of Trade, announced that Bulgaria will need 2.8 
billion cubic meters of natural gas in addition to the 3.34 billion 
that Russia contracted to supply via the Orenburg-Yambol gas 
pipeline.  At the moment, Bulgargaz is delaying its payments for gas 
deliveries but, so far, the Russians have not suspended them. 
Bulgargaz's difficulties stem from the fact that it is owed 9 
billion leva by its customers Nef tokhim, the Devnya Plants, Khimko- 
Vratsa, and others.  Kolev suggested that Bulgaria might be able to 
pay for some of the gas with deliveries of soda ash.  Russian and 
Bulgarian experts are currently discussing this possibility.  (Sofia 
DUMA in Bulgarian 17 Dec 93 p 4 AU) 

   RUSE RIVER LINE WANTS TO SELL VESSELS:  On 17 December, the Board 
of Directors of the Bulgarian River Navigation Company applied to 
the Transport Ministry for permission to dispose of 42 river vessels 
worth a total of 250 million leva.  The board needs the money to 
defray its debts to commercial banks, which total 128.511 million 
leva.  The State Savings Bank has already blocked the steamship 
company's bank accounts but granted a postponement of settlement 
until 20 January.  The Privatization Agency and the Council of 
Ministers have to decide whether to allow the sale of the vessels, 
as the river line is scheduled to be privatized with a statutory 
capital of over 200 million leva.  Clients in Argentina have shown 
an interest in buying vessels.  Their average age is 20 years, and 
each is worth about 40 million leva.  The board of directors does 
not believe the reduction in the company's river fleet will affect 
its operations on the Danube, which have been severely reduced as a 
result of the embargo against Yugoslavia.  (Sofia TRUD in Bulgarian 
17 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENTS IN JOINT VENTURES:  Foreign investment in 
industrial joint ventures in Bulgaria amounts to over 2 billion leva 
(about $515 million), according to the Industry Ministry.  Direct 
foreign investment from the beginning of 1991 to August 1993 
totalled $167,459,853, said BULGARSKI BIZNES, quoting the ministry's 
Investment Commission.  (Sofia BTA in English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   FOREIGN DEBT INTEREST PAYMENT:  By the end of December, the State 
Fund for Reconstruction and Development will assign $27 million for 
interest payments to Bulgaria's commercial creditors for the first 
three-quarters of 1993, Executive Director Maksim Dimov said.  The 
fund aims to reduce the burden on the central bank's foreign 
exchange reserve and to keep the balance in the market.  (Sofia BTA 
in English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   CEMENT INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATION BLOCKED:  Privatization in the 
cement industry has been blocked, Reneta Indzhova, executive 
director of the Privatization Agency, told a news conference 
recently.  Given the current economic situation and output, 
Bulgaria's six plants cannot make cement for export, she said.  As 
it is, the industry will collapse.  The agency and the Construction 
Ministry should pool their efforts and prepare the units for 
privatization, according to Indzhova.  A cement plant in Devnya 
(northeastern Bulgaria) is being reconstructed, BTA's local 
correspondent reported.  Equipment worth 4.5 million German marks 
will be supplied from Germany.  The revamping will be completed next 
autumn and will allow the plant's output to reach the standard of 
the British cement type 450, the report states.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   BULGARIAN-GERMAN AGRICULTURAL PROJECT:  A Bulgarian-German 
agricultural project will be implemented along the Maritsa River 
(southern Bulgaria) as of 1994, the PARI daily reports.  Germany 
will provide consultancy at all stages, from sowing to sale.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   GREEK BUSINESSMEN DISCUSS COOPERATION:  A Bulgarian-Greek 
business forum on Balkan economic cooperation was held in Sofia on 
20 December.  It focused on areas of cooperation and the utilization 
of funds granted to Bulgaria under the European Union's Interreg 
Program for the development of border regions and Operation PHARE 
(Economic and Reconstruction Aid for Poland and Hungary Program). 
The forum was organized by the Central Union of Labor Cooperatives 
in Bulgaria, the Union of Farmer Cooperatives in Kastoria (UFC) 
(Greece), and the Greek consultancy firms Evro-Development and 
Domes.  The participants discussed the role of cooperatives in the 
expansion of contacts between the two countries and the sale of 
products of UFC-Kastoria in Bulgaria.  Grigoris Koutsabuyukidhis, 
president of UFC-Kastoria, said a protocol had been signed with 
Plovdiv's labor cooperative within the framework of Interreg for 
setting up chain stores and for joint production of dairy products. 
Under the PHARE Program, the European Union has already extended ECU 
160 million to Bulgaria for economic adjustment, agriculture and the 
food industry.  Part of these funds will go to UFC-Kastoria.  Greece 
is interested in Bulgarian fertilizers, fodder, and other 
agricultural products and wants to cooperate in the wood-working and 
food industries.  (Sofia BTA in English 1742 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   CHEESE EXPORT TO UNITED STATES:  The Serdika Company in Shumen 
exported the first shipment of 60 tons of cheese made from cow's 
milk to the United States.  It is the only Bulgarian firm to enter 
the U.S. market.  In the past year, it exported 190 tons of cheese 
made from sheep's milk to the United States.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   PARLIAMENT AMENDS BANKING, LENDING ACT:  Parliament amended the 
Banks and Lending Act at first and second reading on 20 December. 
Revaluation of fixed assets has not finished yet because of the 
consolidation and reorganization of the banking system, which 
necessitated an extension of the term by one year until 31 December 
1994.  The extension voted by parliament allows banks with a state 
holding to change their fixed capital after the revaluation.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 0756 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION DECLINES IN OCTOBER:  Industrial output in 
October 1993 fell 7.9 percent short of the October 1992 result and 
the output of the building industry fell 6.7 percent short of the 
October 1992 figure, the Czech Statistical Office reports.  In the 
first 10 months of the year, the index of industrial production fell 
to 94.5 percent and the index of building output to 95.6 percent of 
the level of the same period in 1992.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 10 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   GROWING TRADE WITH ISRAEL:  The volume of Czech-Israeli trade 
turnover reached $84.7 million in the first nine months of 1993, 
compared with $54.6 million for 1992 as a whole.  The Czech Republic 
has thereby overtaken Hungary and Poland to become Israel's most 
important trading partner among the countries of the Visegrad Four. 
Imports from Israel, which consist mainly of telecommunications 
equipment (15 percent), electric goods and appliances (12.8 
percent), and cotton and textiles (10 percent), exceeded Czech 
exports 1.5 times.  The most important Czech export article are 
passenger cars, which account for 71.2 percent of Czech exports, 
followed by iron and steel (12.4 percent), and machinery (4.1 
percent).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Dec 93 p 21 AU) 

   NOVEMBER CONSUMER PRICE GROWTH:  Consumer prices increased 0.5 
percent in November 1993, compared with October, Jarmila Lehnerova, 
spokesperson of the Czech Statistical Office, announced.  While food 
prices decreased 0.3 percent, prices of non-food items increased 0.7 
percent, prices of restaurant meals increased 0.5 percent, and 
prices of services 1.3 percent.  Since the beginning of the year, 
the consumer price index increased 17.2 percent.  While food prices 
increased 12.5 percent and prices of non-food items 17.0 percent, 
the cost of services went up 23.5 percent and the cost of restaurant 
meals 21.6 percent.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   TRADE WITH ITALY BOOMING:  The volume of trade between the Czech 
Republic and Italy increased 60 percent in the first half of 1993. 
Czech imports from Italy amounted to Kcl0 billion and Czech exports 
to Italy to Kc7.5 billion.  Italian companies have invested $100 
million in companies in the Czech Republic.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 
in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   FIRST NON-BANK TITLES ON LISTED SECURITIES MARKET:  The number of 
listed titles on the Prague Stock Exchange will increase by two -- 
Cokoladovny Praha, a sweets and confectionery maker, and IPS Prague, 
a construction firm -- the Stock Exchange Committee decided.  So 
far, only the shares of three banks (Komercni Banka, Ceska 
Sporitelna, and Zivnostenska Banka) have been quoted on the listed 
securities market.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 
14 AU) 

   LIAZ ENGINES FOR RUSSIAN TRUCKS:  As of December the Russian 
Avtoeksport company will begin using engines from the LIAZ Jablonec 
nad Nisou company for its KAMAZ trucks.  LIAZ and Avtoeksport have 
concluded a contract for the delivery of 10,900 engines for KAMAZ, 
whose engine plant was destroyed in a fire.  LIAZ is only one of 
three companies to have met the Russian truck maker's exacting 
criteria, the other two being the U.S. Cummins company and the 
Russian Yaroslavl engine plant.  DAF, Scania, or Detroit Diesel 
engines, for example, all failed the test.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   LIAZ CHASSIS FOR TURKISH TRUCKS:  Representatives of the LIAZ 
Jablonec nad Nisou company and the Turkish Coban-Tur trading company 
signed a contract for the delivery of 600 LIAZ truck chassis. 
Starting in January 1994, LIAZ will supply 50 chassis a month to 
Turkey.  The contract is worth almost $15 million.  (Prague MLADA 
FRONTA DNES in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   BOOMING COMPUTER MARKET:  Since 1989, sales of personal computers 
have been increasing at an annual rate of 33 percent, but the growth 
rate is slowing down.  In 1992, 135,000 personal computers worth 
$220 million were sold in the Czech and Slovak Republics, which 
represented an increase of 41 percent over the preceding year.  In 
1993, some 148,000 personal computers worth $234 million are 
expected to be sold in the two countries, which represents a growth 
rate of "only" 10 percent.  The average price of personal computers 
sold in the Czech Republic and Slovakia is $1,580.  Sales of 
printers are also booming.  In 1992, 116,000 printers worth $71 
million were sold in what still was Czechoslovakia, 43 percent more 
than in 1991.  In 1993, 126,000 printers are expected to be sold in 
the Czech and Slovak Republics, which represents a growth rate of 9 
percent.  The average price of printers sold on the Czech and Slovak 
markets is $620.  The market for copiers has undergone a similar 
development.  Last year's 31 percent growth will be followed by an 
estimated 11 percent growth in 1993.  The number of fax machines 
sold in the Czech and Slovak Republics is expected to reach 38,000 
this year and their total value will be $40 million.  This 
represents a 17 percent increase in sales, following a 40 percent 
increase in 1992.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   BREWERIES HIT BY SLOVAK DEVALUATION:  Breweries in east Moravia, 
which depend on the Slovak market for 20 to 40 percent of their 
output, fear the impact of the 5 percent devaluation of the Slovak 
koruna and the 3 percent revaluation of the Czech koruna against the 
clearing ECU (European Currency Unit), introduced early in December. 
In their opinion, the expected 20 percent general devaluation of the 
Slovak koruna would bring beer exports to Slovakia to a complete 
halt.  In conjunction with the expected drop in sales to Slovakia, 
Moravian breweries now expect a more acute competition on the 
domestic Moravian market.  There are now 70 breweries in the Czech 
Republic, which produced 3.88 million hectoliters of beer last year. 
(Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 8 AU) 

   NOVEMBER UNEMPLOYMENT FIGURES:  The rate of unemployment slightly 
increased in November but the growth remains very slow, Minister of 
Labor and Social Affairs Jindrich Vodicka told journalists.  At the 
end of November 1993, 3.34 percent of the population were out of 
work.  Prague has retained the lowest rate of unemployment (0.34 
percent), while Bruntal district had the highest unemployment (8.12 
percent).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   JAWA MOTORCYCLES FOR TURKISH MARKET:  Jawa Tynec nad Sazavou and 
the Turkish Ozbelge Izmir firm have concluded a contract for the 
supply of motorcycles, components, and spare parts.  In the 
contract, the Turkish partner undertook to import between 6,000 and 
10,000 Jawa motorcycles annually.  The next step to increase sales 
of Jawa motorcycles on the Turkish market, where Jawa is the second 
biggest brand in terms of sales, will be the construction of an 
assembly plant.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   CZECH TRADE CENTER IN KIEV:  On the basis of a contract concluded 
in November 1993, the Job's Trading company from Opava, north 
Moravia, will open a Czech Trade Center in Kiev next year.  The firm 
will reconstruct a complex of buildings in an attractive part of the 
Ukrainian capital, which will house three restaurants, a sales 
center, a warehouse, as well as offices for rent to Czech 
businessmen.  In cooperation with the Ukrainian Vneshneespobyznys 
company and the Czech Ministry of Trade and Industry, Job's Trading 
organized a sales exhibition of 33 Czech companies in Kiev in 
October, at which $5 million worth of contracts were concluded. 
Job's Trading also plans to import 50,000 tons of feed grain from 
Ukraine next year, one-third of which is to be reexported to third 
countries.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 7 AU) 

   NUMBER OF SECURITIES ON STOCK EXCHANGE:  The number of securities 
that can be traded at the Prague Stock Exchange has increased to 
982, of which 955 are coupon privatization shares.  Of the other 27 
securities, four are state bonds, seven are bonds and debentures 
from other issuers, two are participation certificates, and 14 are 
shares that do not have their origin in coupon privatization. 
(Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 13 AU) 

   CZECH SHARES INAUGURATED AT VIENNA STOCK EXCHANGE:  On 13 
December, the shares of a Czech company appeared for the first time 
on the list of quotations of a foreign stock exchange.  The CEZ 
(Czech Power-Generating Works) company issued 200,000 options for 
the purchase of CEZ shares, which have been introduced on the Vienna 
Stock Exchange by the investment branch of Bank Austria.  CEZ shares 
are currently the most heavily traded shares at the Prague Stock 
Exchange.  Those who purchase the CEZ options will be able to buy 
one CEZ share for 600 Austrian schillings by 30 December 1994. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   5,000 KORUNA BANKNOTE PUT INTO CIRCULATION:  On 15 December the 
Czech National Bank (CNB) put into circulation banknotes with a 
nominal value of Kc5,000 ($1 is about Kc30).  The banknote's front 
side carries the portrait of Tomas Garrigue Masaryk, the first 
Czechoslovak president (1918-35), and the back side, a group of 
well-known Prague Gothic and Baroque buildings.  It is mostly gray, 
with some rosy color.  The state printing office will issue a total 
of 20 million Kc5,00O banknotes.  Leopold Surga, director of CNB's 
currency department, said on 14 December the introduction of the 
Kc5,000 banknote was not an expression of distrust in monetary 
development.  The banknotes are supposed to serve especially for 
higher payments and reserves in cash.  They will not be usual in 
payments of wages and current cash-payment relations, CNB's Press 
Spokesman Martin Svehla said.  The banknote has all standard 
protective elements and a plastic sign for the blind. 

   The set of Czech banknotes will be completed by issuing Kc20 and 
Kc2,000 banknotes next year.  The first will bear the portrait of 
Czech King Premysl Otakar I (died 1230), the second, the opera 
singer Ema Destinova (1878-1930).  The Czech Republic has sufficient 
reserves of coins and banknotes, Surga said.  It should be fully 
self-sufficient in minting coins and printing banknotes as of next 
year.  Minting will be done by the mint of Jablonecka Bizuterie and 
printing by the State Printing Office in Prague.  Around 350 million 
Czech banknotes and about 800 million coins were made this year in 
connection with the separation of Czech and Slovak currencies in 
February following the split of Czechoslovakia on January 1, 1993. 
The number is expected to reach 200 million banknotes and 300 
million coins next year.  CNB delayed publishing the economic 
results of the monetary separation from Slovakia because they are so 
far only in the form of rough estimates.  (Prague CTK in English 14 
Dec 93 AU) 

   CSA FOREIGN SHAREHOLDERS DEMAND COMPENSATION:  The foreign 
shareholders of Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA) -- Air France and the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) -- demand 
from CSA the return of some Kc7O0 million, Jiri Weigl, chief of the 
government's consultants, announced after an extraordinary meeting 
of government ministers on 13 December.  According to Weigl, the 
CSA's closing account shows that the Czech contribution to the joint 
venture had been overvalued by that sum.  The two shareholders, who 
paid some Kc1.8 billion for less than 40 percent of CSA shares last 
year, therefore demand a financial settlement.  Jiri Weigl also said 
that the CSA would lose an estimated Kc1.2 billion this year. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 1; Prague CESKY DENIK 
in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   CSA CARRIES OVER 1 MILLION PASSENGERS:  The Czechoslovak Airlines 
(CSA) carried 1,041,385 passengers in the first 10 months of the 
year.  The greatest increase in the number of passengers was on 
CSA's West European (22 percent) and North American (27 percent) 
routes.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 7 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   DISSATISFACTION WITH STANDARD OF LIVING:  The majority of Czechs 
are satisfied and optimistic about developments in their country's 
democracy and foreign policies, but three-quarters are dissatisfied 
with their standard of living and social security.  According to a 
November poll of 802 people by the Institute for Public Opinion 
Research, 48 percent of Czechs are "satisfied" and another 10 
percent "very satisfied" with democratic developments.  On the other 
hand, 74 percent of the respondents described themselves as 
"dissatisfied" with their standard of living, nearly half of those 
"greatly dissatisfied."  Seventy-six percent expressed 
dissatisfaction with their social security, with half (38 percent) 
expressing great dissatisfaction. 

   Nearly the exact same percentages held regarding people's 
optimism, or lack of it, in the respective areas, although the 
number of "great" pessimists on living standards and social security 
drops by 11-12 percent.  Opinions on other aspects of political and 
economic developments showed no clear pattern, except that 
considerably more satisfaction and optimism regarding economic 
transformation, social security, and living standards appears among 
high school and university-level students, as well as among 
entrepreneurs.  One clear explanation is that these people face much 
better opportunities for financial remuneration and advancement than 
most people.  (Prague CTK in English 15 Dec 93 AU) 

   PRAGUE GIVES GREEN LIGHT TO FIRST ESTEE LAUDER STORE:  The 
American cosmetics and perfume maker Estee Lauder is expected to 
open its first store in Prague next year, the City Council decided 
today.  The council decided to rent the Parizska Street space to the 
company for ten years because of its Kcl7.5 million ($600,000) 
contribution to restoration of the historic building.  Estee Lauder 
will have to pay the current tenant, Tuzex, Kc3 million as 
compensation for the space.  The Prague store will be the company's 
third in eastern Europe.  The first two are in Budapest and Moscow. 
(Prague CTK in English 15 Dec 93 AU) 

   FEWER GERMAN TOURISTS VISITING KRKONOSE:  The owners of hotels 
and mountain chalets in the Krkonose (Giant) mountains in north-east 
Bohemia are watching with apprehension the continuing decrease in 
the numbers of their guests, the Dresden daily SAECHSISCHE ZEITUNG 
wrote on 30 November.  The times when over eight million tourists a 
year visited the mountain region are long over, it added.  The daily 
noted that one of the major reasons for the lack of interest in 
visiting the Krkonose in winter time was that many of its regular 
guests from the former German Democratic Republic currently prefer 
to go to the Alps.  On one hand, the Alps are something new for them 
and, on the other, they have had bad experiences with Krkonose price 
levels and the way they compare to the level of services provided. 

   The daily noted that the intention of many of Czech entrepreneurs 
to "bleed East Germans dry" has backfired on them.  For several 
seasons now, the hotels and mountain chalets in Krkonose have been 
only half-full.  It is possible to agree with the higher price level 
in the modernized chalets because they are mostly private properties 
which their owners received in restitution, and they have to repay 
comparativelyhigh bank-loans.  However, -nothing--except the prices 
has changed in many hotels, the daily wrote.  Frequently, guests are 
offered rooms without their own washing facilities, and services are 
far below Western levels.  (Prague CTK in English 30 Nov 93 AU) 

   SKODA MAY BUILD ASSEMBLY PLANT IN POLAND:  The Czech car 
manufacturer Skoda, based in Mlada Boleslav, central Bohemia, is 
considering building a car assembly plant in Poland, according to 
information published in the German daily HANDELSBLATT on 30 
November.  Vice Chairman of the Board Volkhard Kohler says in the 
article that, by building a plant in Poland, the company would avoid 
having to pay high import duty.  The German news agency, DPA, 
reported that the move would not mean a reduction in Skoda 
production in the Czech Republic.  Kohler commented on proposals to 
build a plant in Vietnam or China by saying the company would "first 
practice in its own backyard before going so far."  Contrary to 
earlier plans, Volkswagen would not now be building any new engine 
construction plants for Skoda but would restrict itself to assembly, 
Kohler said.  In the current economic climate such heavy investment 
would be unjustifiable, he said.  (Prague CTK in English 29 Nov 93 
AU) 

   SPOKESMAN CONFIRMS SKODA ENGINE PLANT PROJECT SCRAPPED:  No 
capital is available for financing the construction of Skoda's own 
engine factory and, moreover, the engine-manufacturing capacities of 
the Volkswagen concern are now unused, Jiri Hrabovsky of the press 
department of the Skoda car maker in Mlada Boleslav, central 
Bohemia, told CTK on 30 November.  He said the construction of the 
engine factory would cost about 17 billion crowns (about $580 
million), which would have to be paid by clients in the prices of 
new cars.  Hrabovsky was reacting to an article published in the 
German daily HANDELSBLATT.  The article claimed that Volkswagen, 
which has the largest stake in Skoda, had canceled plans to build an 
engine plant for Skoda and that Skoda was considering building a car 
assembly plant in Poland. 

   Skoda, which created a joint venture with Volkswagen in 1991, now 
expects semi-finished engines to be manufactured abroad and then 
assembled in the Czech Republic.  Skoda is doing its best to ensure 
most components for the new engine come from Czech suppliers. 
Ensuring a high quality will be an important criterion for choosing 
suppliers, Hrabovsky said.  He noted that Skoda expected to sell 
30,000 to 40,000 cars annually in Poland in future.  By imposing a 
41-percent tax and duties on imported Skoda cars, the Polish 
Government dramatically cut Skoda imports from 40,000 cars in 1991 
to 2,200 in the past ten months of this year.  Unless these barriers 
are lifted during negotiations of the Visegrad Four (the Czech and 
Slovak Republics, Hungary, and Poland), assembly of Skoda cars in 
Poland within the next two years would be considered, Hrabovsky 
said.  He added that this would in no case threaten job 
opportunities in the Czech Republic.  The entire project is, 
however, only being considered, he added.  (Prague CTK in English 30 
Nov 93 AU) 

   SKODA TO CUT DEVELOPMENT FUNDING:  The Skoda auto manufacturer 
will invest 3.749 billion German marks (DM) into development over 
the next five years, less than half the originally planned sum, 
Skoda Mlada Boleslav Director Ludvik Kalma told MLADA FRONTA DNES on 
30 November.  Despite this cut, Skoda will maintain its development 
plan, which Board member Volkhard Kohler said would be financed 
primarily by Skoda.  Another 700 million DM will be provided by 
Volkswagen, which is to increase its share in the auto manufacturer 
from 30 to 70 percent over the next two years, the paper writes. 
The investment cut will affect mainly the planned construction of a 
new motor plant, where Volkswagen was to have produced some 400,000 
motors annually for Skoda as well as other Volkswagen concerns, 
Kalma said.  While he said construction of the plant was no longer 
being considered by Volkswagen, according to the daily the Czech 
Government, which is still the majority shareholder in Skoda Mlada 
Boleslav, had not agreed to call it off. 

   In an article in MLADA FRONTA DNES on 1 December, Minister of 
Industry and Trade Vladimir Dlouhy says that if it was shown that 
Volkswagen was not acting in accordance with Skoda's interests, the 
Czech side would begin to act as a majority shareholder.  Dlouhy 
notes that the Czech side accepts the new strategy, which had been 
changed under market pressures, and does not want to force its 
partner into financial losses.  At the same time, however, he 
stresses that there is a minimum level of financial investment, 
without which the future of Skoda, as one of the pillars of Czech 
industry, could not be imagined.  The Volkswagen management cannot 
behave towards Skoda as if it was one of their factories, Dlouhy 
said, as long as it is still a minority shareholder.  In order to 
improve mutual relations and achieve more effective cooperation, 
Dlouhy said, the Czech side should propose a supplement to the 
original agreement from 1991, in which Volkswagen would pledge to 
taking several steps.  These should include concrete, specifically 
defined cooperation in privatizing the remaining 30 percent of 
shares, selling off Skoda's iron works, determining market prices 
for trade between Skoda and Volkswagen, and also not artificially 
lowering Skoda's profits to benefit Volkswagen.  (Prague CTK in 
English 1 Dec 93 AU) 

   TRADE UNION FEARS VW INTENDS TO CUT SKODA WORKFORCE:  According 
to Zdenek Kadlec, chairman of the trade union organization in the 
Skoda Mlada Boleslav automobile company, the German Volkswagen 
concern, which holds a 31 percent stake in the company, intends to 
turn Skoda into a mere "assembly plant" and its Czech workers into 
"guest workers in their own country."  The trade unions fear that, 
following the recently announced investment cuts, only 7,000 of the 
company's 17,000 employees will keep their jobs.  Without 
specifying, Kadlec said that Volkswagen was trying to introduce in 
the Czech Republic "new methods of work that it did not succeed in 
asserting among its German employees."  He also pointed out that, 
while Czech Skoda employees earn an average of 300 German marks per 
month, the company's German employees earn "incomparably more." 
According to Kadlec, the Czech side should not abandon its current 
majority stake (69 percent) in Skoda "as long as the German side 
does not meet its commitments toward the Czech automobile factory." 
(Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 3 AU) 

   SKODA PROFITS DOWN:  The Skoda Mlada Boleslav automobile factory 
expects to make a profit of 2 to 5 million German marks (Kc35-85 
million) this year, the company's representatives announced on 8 
December.  The company will produce the record number of over 
220,000 passenger cars in 1993, about 10 percent more than last 
year.  In 1992, Skoda made a profit of 66 million German marks 
(Kc1.12 billion).  Skoda will be the only member of the Volkswagen 
group (Volkswagen, Audi, Seat, Skoda) to report profit this year. 
The concern as a whole expects to lose 2 billion German marks. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 9 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   TENDER FOR LEASE OF HISTORIC CAFE ANNOUNCED:  The rectorate of 
the Academy of Performing Arts (AMU) published the conditions of the 
new public tender for the lease of Cafe Slavia and Parnas 
Restaurant, both housed in the Lazansky Palace, on 30 November. 
Applicants have until December 20 to present their intentions on the 
use and restoration of the premises and pay a nonrefundable 
application fee of 30,000 crowns (about $1,000).  The AMU commission 
will then announce the winner of the tender for lease.  Once the 
lease agreement has been signed, the new lessees will be able to 
operate the premises by January 15, 1994. 

   AMU has fixed the length of the lease as between ten and fifteen 
years.  It requires the lessee of Slavia to restore the interior in 
the style of the 1930's and preserve reasonable prices and to run 
the AMU college canteen in the basement at cost price.  Slavia's new 
lessee will further be required to contribute to the cost of 
strengthening the aging structure and renovating the facade of the 
building.  The rent has been provisionally set at 4,000 crowns 
(around $140) per square meter, and the sum will be linked to 
inflation.  The AMU Senate put the palace out to tender after 
withdrawing from a lease agreement it had signed two years earlier 
with the U.S.-based company HN Gorin.  That agreement was canceled 
because HN Gorin failed to pay the rent.  Slavia, housed in a palace 
on the bank of the river Vltava beside the National Theater, was a 
favored haunt of Prague artists, intellectuals, and students since 
opening in 1863.  (Prague CTK in English 30 Nov 93 AU) 

   COAL MINES INSOLVENT, TO BE RESTRUCTURED:  Outstanding payments 
to the Czech Social Security Administration, which reached the sum 
of 707 korunas (Kc) million at the end of October 1993, and the 
company's strained financial situation in general have forced the 
management of the Ostrava-Karvina Coal Mines (OKD) to ask Komercni 
Banka for a bridge loan of Kc1 billion.  The OKD offers as 
collateral its outstanding claims, the shares of its subsidiaries, 
and proceeds from planned real estate sales.  The OKD's total 
liabilities amounted to Kc6.684 billion at the end of October, while 
the value of unsold coal in its depots was Kc960 million at the end 
of September and its customers' unpaid bills stood at Kc7.2 billion. 
According to OKD Director General Ivan Dzida, the company's claims 
exceed its liabilities by only Kc200 to Kc3O0 million, however, as 
the sum total of claims also includes "internal claims" within the 
framework of accounting between individual mines.  Ivan Dzida 
expects the OKD to produce a loss of Kc2O0-300 million this year, 
which he blames on the "flawed marketing policy of the previous 
management, which was replaced this September."  Last year, the 
company made a profit of Kc147 million.  The OKD expects to sell 
13.5 million tons of coal this year, compared with 14.1 million tons 
in 1992.  Dzida said that the OKD would be transformed into a 
holding of nine independent mines as of 1 January 1994, which should 
help eliminate the losses.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 30 
Nov 93 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   CSOB LOWERS LOAN INTEREST RATES:  Ceskoslovenska Obchodni Banka 
(Czechoslovak Foreign Trade Bank, CSOB) lowers its loan interest 
rates as of 1 December 1993.  The minimum interest rate has been set 
at 12 percent, the basic interest rate for short-term loans (under 
one year) will be 13.25 percent, for two-year loans 14.5 percent, 
and for loans of up to three years 15.5 percent.  A basic interest 
rate of 14 percent will continue to apply to loan contracts 
concluded prior to 1 December.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 
30 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   QUOTA ON APPLE IMPORTS FROM EC STATES:  EC states will be able to 
export only 15,000 tons of apples to the Czech Republic in 1994. 
The import quota for this commodity will go into effect on 1 January 
1994.  Over the last two years, apple imports from EC countries 
increased sevenfold and reached 42,900 tons (about one-fifth of 
domestic consumption) this year.  The losses of domestic growers 
caused by EC countries' subsidized apple exports are estimated at 
Kc162 million.  The wholesale price of imported apples is Kc7 to Kc8 
per kilogram, thanks to an EC subsidy of 8 European Currency Units 
per 100 kilograms, while Czech growers get an average of Kc9.83 per 
kilogram.  This year's apple harvest is estimated at 330,000 tons, 
130,000 tons of which come from commercial orchards.  This year's 
apple harvest exceeds last year's harvest by 100,000 tons and should 
cover domestic demand.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 29 Nov 
93 p 2; Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 30 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SIXTY PERCENT OF INDUSTRIAL ENTERPRISES INSOLVENT:  Sixty percent 
of industrial enterprises were insolvent at the beginning of 
November, according to a survey carried out by the Czech Statistical 
Office in 731 industrial enterprises accounting for 62 percent of 
the Czech Republic's industrial output.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
in Czech 30 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   REHABILITATION OF LAND DAMAGED BY MINING:  According to a study 
drawn up by the Hydroprojekt Prague company, the restoration of the 
landscape in the Sokolov area, devastated by 40 years of intensive 
mining, will cost Kc9 billion.  Under the study, the work will start 
in the near future and last until 2030, when the coal mines in the 
area will have been depleted.  Sater, a consortium of French firms 
that participated in the successful restoration of the coal basin in 
northern France, promised to help find investors who would finance 
the project.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 30 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   MOST BELIEVE BUSINESSMEN GAINED CAPITAL DISHONESTLY:  Eighty 
percent of Czechs believe that those who have become "big 
businessmen" gained their capital dishonestly in the past, while a 
mere eight percent believe they did not, according to an October 
survey by the Institute for Public Opinion Research (IVVM).  The 
survey asked 777 Czechs aged over 15 the question "Who are our big 
businessmen?" and invited them to reply "yes" or "no" to each of 
five things commonly said about the new entrepreneurs in the Czech 
Republic.  Three-quarters (76 percent) believed that when starting 
businesses, entrepreneurs made use of contacts and information 
gained from their previous employment.  Only nine percent believed 
they did not.  The view that those who had begun to do business were 
entrepreneurial, clever people who had good ideas was considered 
correct by 68 percent, with 20 percent believing they were not. 
Entrepreneurs were believed to be former communist functionaries and 
apparatchiks by 65 percent.  Seventeen percent did not agree. 
Fifty-five percent said that people who had started businesses had 
had property returned to them in the restitution process, while 25 
percent thought they had not.  (Prague CTK in English 1 Dec 93 AU) 

   CZECH-RUSSIAN OIL VENTURE:  The Ural Invest Oil Corporation 
(UOIL) Izhevsk, a joint Russian-Czech venture, was registered by the 
Russian Government on 26 August 1992.  The company, which is engaged 
in the extraction, transport, storage, and sale of crude oil, 
currently employs 41 people.  It has extracted 122,000 tons of crude 
oil this year and plans to increase its production to 1 million tons 
by the year 2000.  As the company does not possess an import license 
for the Czech Republic, it uses the services of the Chemapol 
company, through which it has sold 70,000 tons of crude oil to the 
Czech Republic.  Eventually, the firm hopes to cover 15 percent of 
Czech annual consumption.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 1 Dec 93 
p 6 AU) 

   MINIMUM WAGE INCREASED:  Minimum wage rates in the business 
sector will be raised 6 to 20 percent as of 1 January 1994, the 
Czech Government decided on 1 December.  The minimum hourly wage in 
the lowest wage category will be raised from Kc12 to Kc12.80 and the 
minimum monthly wage from Kc2,200 to Kc2,340.  The minimum hourly 
wage in the highest wage category will be raised from Kc24 to 
Kc28.80, which corresponds to a monthly increase from Kc4,450 to 
Kc5,350.  Prime Minister Klaus justified the uneven increases by the 
need for greater differentiation among individual wage categories. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 22 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   CZECH-FRENCH MAIL-ORDER FIRM:  The Magnet Pardubice AS and the 
French Camif company have signed an agreement on setting up a joint 
mail-order firm.  Magnet Pardubice, which runs a network of 35 
stores with industrial goods in east Bohemia, will have a minority 
stake in the joint enterprise.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES PENIZE 
Supplement in Czech 2 Dec 93 p 13 AU) 

   GERMANY'S HARTMAN FIRM TO INVEST KC8O0 MILLION:  Two contracts on 
the sale of shares and four plants of the Rico Veverska Bityska 
state enterprise to the German Paul Hartmann company were signed on 
the premises of the National Property Fund in Prague on 1 December. 
This act completed the privatization of the Rico state enterprise, 
the largest manufacturer of health-care and hygiene products in the 
Czech Republic.  The four plants, which together employ about 1,000 
people, are located at Veverska Bityska, Havlickuv Brod, 
Chvalkovice, and Most.  They control 30 to 40 percent of the Czech 
market.  According to Jiri Cerny, a representative of Hartmann-Rico, 
the German firm's Czech subsidiary, the two contracts guarantee an 
investment of Kc800 million over the next five years, which makes 
this the largest investment of foreign capital in the Czech economy 
in the last quarter of 1993.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 
Dec 93 p 2; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 4 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   DUTCH SUPERMARKET CHAIN IN NORTH MORAVIA:  According to Jan 
Navratil, director of the Pramen Ostrava state enterprise, Pramen's 
11 "best-integrated" supermarkets in north Moravia with an aggregate 
book value of Kc90 million will be sold directly to the Dutch Ahold 
company.  They will be operated by Eurodomus and Euronova, Ahold's 
Czech subsidiaries, which have been leasing some of these stores for 
over a year.  The remaining parts of Pramen Ostrava will be divided 
into five independent companies and privatized separately -- by the 
coupon method, through public auctions, or through direct sale to a 
designated buyer.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Dec 93 p 6 
AU) 

   LARGEST TRANSACTION ON PRAGUE STOCK EXCHANGE:  A total of 180,000 
Komercni Banka (Commercial Bank, KB) shares worth Kc936 million 
changed hands at the Prague Stock Exchange on 2 December, in what 
was the largest single sale of shares in the history of the 
exchange.  The 180,000 shares represent about 3.6 percent of the 
KB's capital stock.  Only six owners (the Czech National Property 
Fund, the Slovak National Property Fund, and four investment funds) 
control a package of KB's shares of this size, but none of them 
owned up to the sale.  In the opinion of Finance Minister Ivan 
Kocarnik, the transaction was "an excellent signal that the capital 
market is taking off." (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 3 Dec 93 p 
1 AU) 

   ELECTRIC CARS FOR GERMAN MARKET:  The ELIS company in Plzen has 
started to equip Opel Corsa passenger cars with electric drive for 
the German market.  By the end of the year it will supply to Germany 
the first 10 electricity-powered Opel Corsas at a cost of about 
42,000 German marks per vehicle.  The company already has an order 
for the delivery of 100 more vehicles in 1994.  The car's battery 
must be recharged after about 70 km.  The car runs at a maximum 
speed of 80 km per hour.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 3 Dec 
93 p 3 AU) 

   LOWER INTEREST ON SHORT-TERM DEPOSITS:  Investicni Banka 
(Investment Bank, IB) is lowering the interest rate on so-called 
"ultra-short-term" and short-term deposits by 0.3 to 0.5 percent 
effective 6 December.  The new interest rates range from 6 percent 
for seven-day deposits to 12.2 percent for 11-month deposits. 
Interest rates on 1-to-4-year term deposits remain unchanged.  The 
maximum interest rate is 15.5 percent for 4 year term deposits. 
(Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 3 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   DOMESTIC FIRM OUTBIDS FOREIGN CONSORTIUM:  The Pragomilk company, 
set up by two Czech businessmen (Benacek and Hladky) won the public 
tender for 51 percent of the shares of Pragolaktos, one of the 
largest and strategically most important dairy plants in the Czech 
Republic.  Pragomilk offered to pay Kc436 million for the shares and 
to invest another Kc250 million in Pragolaktos over the next three 
years.  It outbid an international consortium comprising Unilever 
and the Austrian AMF company, which was willing to pay only Kc25O 
million for the shares.  Some 21 percent of Pragolaktos shares will 
be offered to investors in the second wave of coupon privatization. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 4 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 
   CHANGING STRUCTURE OF LABOR FORCE:  At the end of the third 
quarter (30 September 1993), 34.8 percent of the labor force was 
employed in industry (compared with 38.9 percent in 1989), 7.2 
percent in agriculture (11.6 percent), and 49.3 percent in services 
(41.7 percent).  The structure of employment has thus moved closer 
to that common in advanced Western countries.  (Prague DENNI 
TELEGRAF in Czech 7 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   STEEL INDUSTRY REMAINS PROFITABLE:  Speaking at a news conference 
in Ostrava on 6 December, Minister of Trade and Industry Vladimir 
Dlouhy conceded that continuous casting was a condition for Czech 
metallurgy to stay internationally competitive, but ruled out that 
the Czech Government would take over loan guarantees for all three 
north Moravian steel mills (Vitkovice, Trinec, Ostrava) that plan to 
build continuous casting units.  Dlouhy said that a "certain 
selection" was necessary and that one of the three companies would 
not receive a government guarantee.  He added that the modernization 
of the steel industry would have to be completed as soon as possible 
because the Czech Republic's current comparative advantages, 
stemming from cheap labor, would disappear within three to four 
years.  The minister noted that a reduction in profits from 
metallurgical production was becoming apparent already.  In 1991 
profits amounted to 4.9 billion korunas; this year they are expected 
to reach Kc3 billion.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 7 Dec 93 p 6 
AU) 

   FOREIGN ENVIRONMENTAL AID CRITICIZED:  The Czech Government 
assesses the program of financial aid that has been thus far 
provided by foreign institutions for environment protection very 
critically, as the majority of these programs failed to fulfill 
expectations, Czech Environment Minister Frantisek Benda told 
journalists on 7 December.  He said the Czech Republic would 
continue to accept foreign aid only if it is provided in a different 
form.  This primarily concerns PHARE, the program of assistance to 
Eastern and Central European Countries, which he said should 
concentrate more on specific investment programs.  Financial aid 
provided on the level of partnership contacts between Czech industry 
and foreign partners, he said, is aimed at enforcing some foreign 
technologies in the Czech Republic which can only with difficulty be 
applied in advanced countries. 

   The basic problem is that the majority of foreign investment 
programs do not offer an investment model acceptable to the Czech 
Republic, they exercise pressure on the Czech Government in trying 
to receive state guarantees for each large investment, Benda said, 
adding that this is unacceptable as the state "does not have so many 
resources."  Due to this, those partners who offer more advantageous 
models of financing which do not require state guarantees have 
bigger success in the foreign aid programs.  Deputy Environment 
Minister Vladislav Bizek said that 20,000,000 ECU (European Currency 
Units) has been provided to the Czech Republic through the PHARE 
program, 75 percent of which has gone to material aid, for example 
to equipping laboratories and preparing some project documentation 
for investment.  However, in some cases financial resources have 
been spent on "monster plans" which merely indicate the state of the 
Czech environment.  Bizek said that the ministry was preparing the 
Banking Fund for Environment and that a bank is currently being 
chosen which would manage the financial resources obtained from 
foreign aid.  (Prague CTK in English 7 Dec 93 AU) 

   SALE OF BREWERY SHARES TO BRITISH COMPANY APPROVED:  The annual 
meeting of shareholders of the Prazske Pivovary (Prague Breweries, 
PP) AS, held in Prague on 7 December, approved the sale of 34 
percent of the company's shares to the Bass PLC, the largest British 
brewery company, for Kc396 million.  The British company will also 
obtain the exclusive right to market PP beer outside Central Europe. 
As its first activity, Bass will introduce the "Staropramen" brand, 
under the name "Prague Lager," in its own network of pubs.  The 
British partner was selected out of 38 contenders, mainly because of 
its marketing expertise and its distribution network in Great 
Britain and other countries.  Bass intends to invest 50 million 
British pounds in PP's production and distribution network over the 
next 5 years.  PP's Prague management will also be reinforced by six 
British executives.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 
2; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   U.S. FIRM LEASES TEXTILE FACTORY:  The U.S. Anvil company has 
leased on a long-term basis the Miletin plant of the Tiba Dvur 
Kralove textile company where it will produce 16,000 cotton T-shirts 
a week for the Czech market.  The equipment has been supplied by the 
Japanese Juki company.  In the first stage, the plant will employ 
200 people.  Eventually, it will employ 375 people and double its 
production capacity.  The U.S. company intends to invest Kc40-60 
million in the company.  The first stage of the plant's 
reconstruction, which cost Kc18 million, has just been completed. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 7 AU) 

   SALARY INCREASE FOR GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS, LEGISLATORS:  At its 
meeting on 7 December, the Chamber of Deputies decided to raise the 
salaries of all constitutional officials, with the exception of the 
president, 24 percent as of 1 January 1994.  The chairman of the 
Chamber of Deputies and the prime minister will both receive a 
monthly salary of Kc38,500, Kc7,500 more than they get now.  The 
basic salary of parliamentary deputies will be raised from Kc13,000 
to Kc16,0O0.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   MOST LEVI'S SOLD IN COUNTRY FAKE:  Fake Levi's jeans are among 
the most frequently sold imitations of world-known brand products in 
the Czech Republic.  According to the results of an inquiry carried 
out by the Czech Trade Inspection Authority (COI), nine out of ten 
Levi's 501 bought by the COI in shops in the Czech Republic were 
fake.  The imitations cost between Kc400 and Kc990, while the only 
original Levi's 501 cost Kc1,800.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in 
Czech 8 Dec 93 p 3 AU) 

   AGRICULTURE SECTOR LOSING MONEY:  State farms will end this 
economic year with a loss of Kc8,500 per hectare, cooperatives with 
a loss of Kc1,050 per hectare, and private farmers with a loss of 
Kc157 per hectare.  This prognosis was presented by J. Netik, 
president of the Agrarian Chamber of the Czech Republic, at a 
seminar held at the Prague Agricultural College on 7 December. 
Agriculture Minister Josef Lux, who also addressed the seminar, said 
that it was the government's responsibility to guarantee at least 
"minimum profit" for the best and average-performing agricultural 
enterprises.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   ELECTRICITY FROM WIND POWER:  The Institute of the Physics of the 
Atmosphere of the Czech Academy of Sciences estimates that about 
three percent of the Czech Republic's electricity could be generated 
by wind-power plants.  The turbines would have to be erected in 
altitudes above 700 meters, however, where current regulations 
mostly prohibit any construction activity for environmental reasons. 
The institute has built an experimental wind-power plant in the 
Krusne Hory (Ore Mountains) and will monitor its environmental 
impact over the next four years.  According to Josef Stekl, the 
institute's director, the development of this source of energy is 
hindered by the "financial diktat" of the CEZ (Czech Power- 
Generating Works) company, the monopoly distributor of electricity, 
which procures electricity from small producers at one-third of the 
consumer price.  As a result, it takes 16 years for the builder of a 
wind-power plant to recoup his investment.  Wind-power generators 
who consume this electricity themselves recover their costs in one- 
third of the time.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   MORE LAND SOWN WITH GRAIN:  The growing procurement prices of 
cereals have prompted Czech farmers to increase the area sown with 
grain crops.  Winter wheat had been grown on 754,802 hectares this 
year (20,161 hectares more than in 1992), rye on 66,976 hectares 
(increase of 1,471 hectares), and spring barley on 443,652 hectares 
(compared with 438,406 hectares last year).  Between 1989 and 
October 1993, the price of alimentary wheat increased 49.5 percent, 
the price of feed wheat 55 percent, the price of malt barley 29.3 
percent, and the price of feed barley 54.7 percent.  (Prague MLADA 
FRONTA DNES in Czech 9 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   CHANGING STRUCTURE OF INDUSTRY:  The average number of employees 
in Czech industrial enterprises decreased from 922 in 1989 to 467 at 
the end of September 1993.  In the same period, the number of 
industrial enterprises employing more than 2,000 people dropped from 
199 to 134 and the number of industrial enterprises employing 
between 1,000 and 1,999 people from 283 to 177.  There were 3,041 
industrial enterprises with more than 25 employees in the Czech 
Republic at the end of September 1993.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 
FINANCNI NOVINY in Czech 9 Dec 93 p 9 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT APPROVES BILL ON REDRESS OF PROPERTY WRONGS:  On 8 
December, the government approved a bill on redress in cases of 
injustices regarding property, deciding to extend the time-limit for 
dealing with redress claims from one year to three.  The bill is 
designed to bring the legal norm more into line with the practical 
state of affairs concerning the speed with which property redress 
claims can be dealt with.  The present law gives the Privatization 
Ministry a year and the Finance Ministry six months to deal with 
claims, Government Spokesman Klara Pospisilova said.  Premier Vaclav 
Klaus told journalists that the government had also approved a bill 
by which ten percent would be added to property reimbursements for 
every year from the end of the time-limit until the claim was dealt 
with.  (Prague CTK in English 8 Dec 93 AU) 

   BORDER-CROSSING DELAYS HINDER CZECH-SLOVAK TRADE:  Long lines of 
trucks at Czech-Slovak border crossings are slowing down trade 
between the two countries, the general director of the Czech 
Confederation of Industry (SP CR), Bretislav Ostadal, said on 9 
December.  Representatives of Czech and Slovak entrepreneurial 
unions decided at a meeting at the end of November they would fight 
for the establishment of "green" lanes for Czech and Slovak freight 
transport.  This would mean that two of the eight border crossings 
would be reserved for freight transport between the Czech Republic 
and Slovakia.  Ostadal stated that the Czech and Slovak 
entrepreneurial unions think that the government should not require 
value-added tax amounts to be deposited at border crossings, as is 
the current practice.  Businessmen from both countries say they are 
providing credit to the state budget for 35 to 40 days while waiting 
for administrators to return the sum due to them.  (Prague CTK in 
English 9 Dec 93 AU) 

   IMPORTED HEATING OIL SOLD AS DIESEL FUEL:  It is the country's 
biggest tax evasion scandal since the fall of communism and yet it 
is scarcely reported by the media, Istvan Leko wrote in a commentary 
in the independent LIDOVE NOVINY on 9 December.  He was referring to 
the crooked business of importing heating oil and selling it as 
diesel oil.  Traders in "dirty oil" -- so called because of the 
pollutant fumes produced -- deprived the Czech Treasury of between 
three and five billion korunas (about $100 to $170 million) in the 
first eight months of this year alone.  The relevant ministries, the 
state-owned oil company Benzina, and Czech refineries have known 
about the swindle for almost a year but, Leko wrote, the police only 
started to investigate the matter deeply a few weeks ago. 
Television is silent on the story. 

   Trading in dirty oil is perhaps the most profitable illegal 
business in the Czech Republic, safer than sex or drugs, Leko wrote. 
One 50-ton tank can sell for Kc300,000 (around $10,000).  The crooks 
are hard to detect.  They are professionals.  They know all the 
loopholes in the law, many such firms are run by former refinery 
executives and one-time high-ranking state officials, whose 
erstwhile subordinates at the ministry are now tackling the problems 
of diesel.  A tradesman selling dirty oil does not have to pay 
consumer tax on heating oil and only has to pay five percent VAT 
instead of the usual 23 percent, and thus can undercut distributors 
of genuine diesel.  Running an engine on dirty oil may be cheaper 
but it destroys the fuel injection system and valves in the engine. 
What is more, the exhaust fumes contain several times the amount of 
sulfur permitted by the Ministry of Transport. 

   Agricultural workers, building firms and a range of other 
companies buy the dirty oil because they can get it for Kc11 while 
real diesel costs Kc15.70.  Their invoices show that they bought the 
heating oil and diesel separately, but they know their vehicles can 
easily run on a mixture.  If need be they can claim to have used the 
heating oil for the drying of grain or hops.  The tax evasion is 
virtually undetectable.  All three Czech refineries have pledged to 
use an invisible marking dye made by BASF to distinguish between 
heating oil and diesel.  The process is expensive and no law obliges 
them to do it.  But they cannot stand by and watch sales dwindle 
further (since 1990 they have fallen by 65 percent).  As yet no law 
exists to punish the petroleum swindlers and deputies are unable to 
say when such a bill might be debated.  If the police, ministries 
and members of parliament had waken up earlier, if they had made use 
of the experience of the legislatures of Western countries or even 
Visegrad countries (in Hungary, for example, legal action is already 
being taken against oil swindlers), the state would not have had to 
lose a sum which could have covered the costs of unemployment 
benefit for a whole year, Leko wrote.  (Prague CTK in English 9 Dec 
93 AU) 

   MOST CZECHS OPTIMISTIC ABOUT ECONOMY IN 1994:  Forty-one percent 
of Czechs do not think that any essential changes occurred in the 
development of the Czech economy in the past year, according to a 
poll conducted by ECOMA agency within an international Eco Monitor 
93 project among 410 people in November.  Over 24 percent of those 
polled considered that the Czech Republic's economic situation 
better, almost 28 percent said they believed it was worse, and 7 
percent said they did not know.  The poll showed that the Czechs 
were optimistic regarding the developments in 1994.  Over 33 percent 
of them said they expected the economy to improve in the next year. 
Over 35 percent believe the development will remain unchanged, and 
almost 21 percent said they expected the economy's decline. 
Positive developments are expected mainly by younger citizens (aged 
between 18-34), while big cities' residents said future developments 
worried them.  (Prague CTK in English 9 Dec 93 AU) 

   HUNGARY 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY PRIVATIZED:  Magyarcom, a German-US 
consortium comprising Deutsche Bundespost Telecom and Ameritech 
International, has acquired a 30-percent-plus stake in the Hungarian 
Telecommunications Company (MATAV RT).  The relevant agreement was 
signed by the three firms and the Hungarian State Holding Company 
(AV RT).  Magyarcom's bid for the stake in MATAV was $875 million. 
Of this sum paid on a half-and-half basis by the two members of the 
consortium, $400 million will go on an equity raise.  The deal has 
so far been the biggest one in the privatization process, and the 
price paid by Magyarcom makes up more than half of the revenue from 
privatization this year.  At present, Magyarcom has a 30.2-percent 
stake in MATAV,- -and the -International-- Finance Corporation and 
the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development together just 
under 10 percent.  The remaining shares are in the hands of AV RT, 
representing the Hungarian state.  The equity rise will make it 
possible for the company to expand the telecommunications network by 
15.5 percent in each of the next six years.  Due to the deal, the 
company will be able to meet 90 percent of demand for telephone 
lines within six months.  Magyarcom agreed to invest almost $4 
billion in developing Hungary's telecommunications network by the 
end of the century.  (Budapest MTI in English 0714 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   OPEL TIGRA TO USE ENGINES MADE IN SZENTGOTTHARD:  GM's new Opel 
Tigra, which is to go into full production at the end of 1994, will 
be equipped with engines manufactured at GM's factory in 
Szentgotthard, in western Hungary.  The Tigra will be fitted with 
the same 1.6 liter, 16-valve, engines as Opel Corsa GSIS.  These 
engines accounted for 8,900 of the 70,395 units manufactured by 
General Motors Hungary in 1993.  (Budapest MTI in English 1427 GMT 
28 Dec 93 AU) 

   IKARUS' POSITION STABILIZES:  As a result of its 1993 crisis 
management program the position of bus manufacturer Ikarus RT has 
stabilized.  Although this year Ikarus is to manufacture 3,000 
buses, as compared to 4,000 last year and an annual average of 12- 
14,000 in the 1980's, the company will close the 1993 business year 
without a loss.  In 1992 the company made an undisclosed loss on 
revenues of 23 billion forints.  (Budapest MTI in English 1420 GMT 
28 Dec 93 AU) 

   ECONOMIC NEWS IN BRIEF:  The European Investment Bank (EIB) will 
grant Hungary a 72 million ECU loan to reconstruct roads and 
bridges.  The cost of projects financed from the loan will total ECU 
151 million. 

   In the first eleven months of this year, the State Property 
Agency (AVU) received 56.99 billion forints ($0.56 billion) from 
privatization.  Almost half of this sum was paid in cash.  The AVU 
collected the equivalent of 14.48 billion forints in foreign 
currency.  Last year, the AVU's intake totalled 74.56 billion 
forints. 

   The Ministry of International Economic Relations will set next 
year's quota for the import of consumer goods at 750 million 
forints, the same as this year.  The sum will probably be 
sufficient, although applications for import licenses exceeded the 
quota this year, the amount of consumer goods actually imported 
stood at 60 percent of the quota.  (Budapest MTI in English 1808 GMT 
22 Dec 93 AU) 

   GAMBLING FIRMS TO USE HIGH TECHNOLOGY:  A satellite data 
transmission and computer control system, enabling gamblers to bet 
even an hour before the draw, has been established in Hungary.  The 
system transmits lottery and football.  The system, using American 
AT and Tridom equipment, was developed and installed by the 
Hungarian Montana Telecom company.  Gambling Inc. has put into 
operation 3,750 electromechanical stamping machines made by the 
Swedish Essnet company, used for receiving and validating lottery 
tickets.  Codes for the tickets are transmitted to the Budapest 
center, put on micro-film, and locked away.  Until the new system is 
completely introduced, it will run in parallel with the old, manual 
system.  The new system is said to exclude the chance of 
manipulation and fraud.  The only chance of error stems precisely 
from the accuracy of modern technology: If betters fail to mark 
their bets unambiguously or use, for instance, green ink, the new 
system automatically invalidates their tickets.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1348 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   NEW BRITISH AIRWAYS FLIGHT HURTS MALEV:  The Hungarian 
authorities' decision to license British Airways' new flight between 
Budapest and London may cause a loss of 60 million forints to the 
Hungarian airline company MALEV RT. over the next six months.  MALEV 
was shocked to learn about the decision because the Hungarian- 
British air agreement stipulates that new flights can only be 
launched with mutual consent.  The company has now asked the 
minister of transport to revise the decision.  The new flight, 
licensed for half a year, will take off from London airport 45 
minutes before MALEV's.  The measure hits MALEV particularly hard 
since the company took out a loan to purchase two Boeing-767's 
earlier this year, and the operation of these aircraft on the 
Budapest-Rome-New York route caused a loss of about $2 million in 
half a year.  In a bid to reduce costs, MALEV is considering leasing 
out the two aircraft, or looking for a new partner to operate direct 
flights between Budapest and New York.  Thirty-five percent of MALEV 
shares are held by the Italian airline company Alitalia.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1129 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   DIRECT FLIGHTS BETWEEN BUDAPEST, BANGKOK:  The first direct 
flight between Budapest and the Thai capital, Bangkok, will take off 
from Budapest on 28 December.  A Boeing 767 intercontinental 
passenger aircraft owned by the Hungarian airline MALEV, will be 
used by a travel agency for the first charter flight, carrying 193 
passengers.  Eleven charter flights are scheduled, making the 
10,000-kilometer trip without stopovers.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1811 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   PRIVATE SAVINGS IN FOREIGN CURRENCY EXCEED $2 BILLION:  In 
November this year the forint equivalent of private savings deposits 
in foreign currency grew by 2.4 billion forints to exceed 200 
billion forints for the first time, according to the Hungarian 
National Bank.  On November 30, the value of such savings deposits 
was 200.7 billion forints, or $2 billion.  Accounting in 
conversions, 31.7 billion forints was deposited and 29.4 billion 
forints recently withdrawn.  This year private savings in foreign 
currency increased by nearly 50 billion forints, half of which 
stemmed from the 15-percent devaluation of Hungary's currency. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1250 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   PARLIAMENT AMENDS CENTRAL BANK LAW:  Finance Minister Ivan Szabo 
said that an amendment to the 1991 Law on the Hungarian National 
Bank (MNB) was necessary since its deadline for narrowing the 
central bank's commercial activities has now expired.  The central 
bank can no longer keep the cash accounts of insurance companies and 
broking firms, and cannot force economic societies to keep their 
accounts with the MNB.  At the same time, the proposal provides 
another two-year extension to the MNB to market its shares in 
certain economic partnerships.  State debt rules change.  The budget 
will pay interest on its interest-bearing debts to the central bank 
at the average interest rate on the MNB's gross foreign debts plus 1 
percent.  Also the central bank will transform at least an annual 5 
percent of the gross state debt not bearing interest into interest- 
bearing state securities.  This debt would be further reduced by the 
value of central bank loans for privatization.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1800 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   AVU CHIEF SEES PRIVATIZATION COMPLETION BY END OF 1994:  Top 
State Property Agency (AVU) official Lajos Csepi said that 
privatization of state-owned assets under temporary state ownership 
could be concluded by the end of 1994, provided bids are invited by 
the middle of the following year.  According to AVU data, 
productivity of converted companies was 20-25 percent higher this 
year than that of state-owned companies, while privatized companies 
increased their assets by 1-1.2 percent and state-owned economic 
organizations suffered a 20-percent loss of assets.  Of the 580 
companies still owned by the state, 284 are currently being 
liquidated, 82 are being wound up, and 32 are undergoing bankruptcy 
proceedings.  Domestic investors accounted for 70 percent of AVU 
privatization revenues this year, compared to 40 percent in 1992 and 
only 20 percent in 1991.  Latest AVU figures put AVU privatization 
revenues at 56.99 billion forints up to the end of November, 30.37 
billion forints of which were cash payments, with 14.48 billion 
forints in foreign exchange.  (Budapest MTI in English 1247 GMT 27 
Dec 93 AU) 

   PRICE OF GASOLINE TO DROP, DIESEL TO RISE:  The price of gasoline 
will be reduced by 0.5 forints per liter at MOL Co. filling stations 
from January 3.  However, diesel prices will rise.   Diesel and 
industrial fuel oil will go up by two forints per liter, household 
heating oil by one forint.  Accordingly, 91 and 95 octane unleaded 
gasoline at the AFOR stations will cost 73 and 75 forints, 
respectively.  Leaded 92 octane gasoline will cost 75.50 forints per 
liter, 98 octane will cost 78 forints, Diesel 65 forints, and 
household heating oil 26 forints, starting January 3.  About one- 
third of the filling stations in Hungary are owned by MOL Co.  The 
rest are operated by Hungarian private entrepreneurs, Hungarian- 
foreign joint entrepreneurs, and foreign oil companies.  On past 
years' experience they will all follow the price policy of MOL. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1720 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   NOVEMBER UNEMPLOYMENT:  The number of registered unemployed fell 
to 635,000 in November, 70,000 down from the maximum rate this 
decade -- recorded in February 1993.  The Central Statistical Office 
recently released this year's unemployment data.  Detailed analyses 
reveal that from January to late November of this year, 282,000 
jobless people ceased to be registered and eligible for unemployment 
benefits.  These people can now apply for a social allowance from 
the local authorities.  In November, there were 61,300 registered 
job openings in the country, nine for every 100 unemployed.  In 
Borsod-Abauj-Zemplen, Heves, and Somogy counties, the ratio of job 
openings to jobseekers was hardly more than three jobs to every 100, 
whereas Budapest had the highest rate, with 20 per 100.  In 
November, 30,000 vacancies were filled.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1025 GMT  28 Dec 93 AU) 

   INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVING STEADILY:  Central Statistical Office 
figures show total investment in 1993 matching 1992, but the ratio 
of infrastructure-related investment rising within this.  Of the 
242.6 billion forints invested in the first three-quarters of 1993, 
transport, post, and telecommunications, and electricity and water 
investment shared 37 percent of the full amount.  There are an 
average of 33.2 kilometers of roads per 100 square kilometers.  The 
water conduit network in 1992 was more than 55,000 kilometers:  Over 
4,000 kilometers of the network was built in the last four years. 
Piped drinking water goes to 89 percent of villages.  Three-quarters 
of homes, about 3 million homes, are linked to the public utility 
network.  The public utility sewage network in 1992 extended to 
16,000 kilometers.  Homes linked to the public sewage system rose 
from 1.6 to 1.7 million over the past three years.  This means that 
43 percent of homes are linked to the sewage system.  Piped gas was 
available in 589 villages last year, 172 of which joined the network 
after 1989.  At the end of 1992, the network covered about 30,000 
kilometers, and was linked to 1.8 million households.  Telephone 
access has gone up by 18 percent in four years, with 20 telephones 
per 100 residents at the end of 1992.  There were 40 percent more 
main lines than in 1989, 1.3 million, nationwide.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1639 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   REGIONAL ECONOMIC DISPARITIES:  The widening gap in prosperity 
between Hungary's various regions is becoming a significant problem 
in the country's economic development.  Sociologists are concerned 
about the long-term effects of regional economic disparities on the 
population.  Internal migration has already begun, with unemployed 
skilled workers from the less advanced regions in eastern Hungary 
moving to find work in the western regions.  Experts say northwest 
Hungary has the most advanced infrastructure and economic and 
intellectual capacities, while the northeast is the most 
undeveloped.  The remaining 50 percent of the country lags behind 
the western part only in terms of infrastructure. 

   Regional inequalities in Hungary have geographical, economic and 
political causes.  Under the old regime, the state tried to 
artificially balance regional development.  Still, the western 
region that borders Austria experienced higher rates of 
infrastructure development.  About three-quarters of the country's 
international road, railway, and river freight transport passes 
through this region.  (A total of 9 million passengers and 8 million 
tons of freight were transported by the international railway line 
in northwestern Hungary this year.)  A high-standard service and 
tourism industry has also sprung up around this international 
traffic junction.  About 70-80 percent of foreign investments in 
Hungary -- and every eighth venture in East Central Europe involving 
foreign capital -- have been in this region.  The largest ones are 
the Audi engine factory under construction in Gyor and the general 
motors Opel car factory in Szentgotthard. 

   The effect of this has been the emergence of a prosperous, 
specialized labor and management force in the region.  Experts 
believe northwest Hungary continues to be an ideal investment area 
for westerners due to a skilled, inexpensive and easily retrainable 
workforce, an advanced infrastructure, and close proximity to 
Western Europe.  To further this, work has begun on the Vienna- 
Budapest motorway project and an airport in Szombathely, a regional 
center.  Urban sociologists say that the area bordered by the Danube 
and the Tisza -- comprising 50 percent of the country's territory -- 
is on an equal level with the northwest socially and economically. 
There are several important urban centers in this area possessing 
scientific and intellectual bases springing from university 
traditions i.e. Budapest, Pecs (southwest Hungary), Szeged 
(southeast), and Debrecen (east Hungary).  However, only Budapest's 
infrastructure can compete with the northwest. 

   Northeast Hungary is presently the most underdeveloped region, 
with unemployment rates of about twice the national average of 12.6 
percent.  The main reason for this is a major decline in local 
heavy-industry production over the past years and an underdeveloped 
infrastructure, such as a tiny, poor-quality telephone network. 
This is the greatest obstacle to the new job-creating investments. 

   The government and local authorities recognize the danger of this 
inequality between the regions and have taken various steps to 
rectify the situation.  A survey of 3,200 Hungarian villages has 
been carried out to find out which are most in need of state 
subsidies earmarked for job-creation and infrastructure development 
projects.  According to the Central Statistical Office, one-third of 
the villages need assistance.  In response, the Regional Development 
Council was set up in east Hungary.  EC countries recently awarded 
the council ECU 2 million for development projects.  (Budapest MTI 
in English 0840 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES RISE 0.7 PERCENT IN NOVEMBER:  Consumer prices 
rose by 0.7 percent in November compared with the previous month, 
the Central Statistical Office (KSH) reported.  Monthly consumer 
price inflation was 1.7 percent in October and 2.9 percent in 
September.  Consumer price inflation for the 12 months to the end of 
November stood at 21 percent (22 percent at the end of October), 
while average consumer prices for the 11 months were 22.6 percent up 
on the January-November period of last year.  Average consumer 
prices for January-October 1993 were 22.8 percent higher than over 
the same period of last year. 

   KSH figures for November consumer price increases: 
BOT 
   (December, 1992: 100)                 Change (Percent) 
Item                                        in 1 Month  in 12 Months 
Foodstuffs                122.2                0.6       24.5 
Alcoholic Beverages, 
  Tobacco                 117.5                0.5       17.9 
Clothing                  114.8                1.3       16.4 
Consumer Durables         109.5                0.9       10.5 
Household Energy          113.4                0.9       14.0 
Other Industrial 
 Articles, Fuels          118.4                1.2       20.8 
Services                  125.6                0.4       26.5 
Total                     119.5                0.7       21.0 
(Budapest MTI in English 1527 GMT  15 Dec 93 AU) 
EOT 

   GATT TALKS RESULTS SEEN AS FAVORABLE:  All in all, the results of 
the GATT talks, which ended on December 15, are favorable for 
Hungary, according to a report by the International Economic 
Relations Ministry.  According to the report, the creation of 
effective international discipline means protection for smaller 
countries dependent upon external economic ties against 
protectionist measures taken by their partners.  Clearing some of 
the obstacles from the way of international trade, especially 
curbing the export subsidies competition in agricultural trade, 
helps expand world trade and has a favorable effect on Hungary's 
export opportunities.  According to reliable estimates, implementing 
the results of the Uruguay Round will increase the size of 
international trade in goods and services by over $200 billion. 
Good international trade conditions are of the utmost importance for 
Hungary to succeed in creating a market-oriented economy, the 
ministry's report says. 

   Under the decision made at the Uruguay Round of the GATT talks, 
the sides are to submit the package of agreements to their 
authorities to make the decisions necessary for the final approval 
of the results, in line with regulations of the countries concerned. 
In the talks, Hungary sought to attain a package of agreements to 
increase the country's chances of gaining access to markets, to 
improve export conditions, and to make international trade 
regulations more predictable.  It also wanted the agreements to 
reflect Hungary's specific situation, stemming from a radical 
economic restructuring, and the country's interests and 
possibilities to accept obligations.  Hungary attaches great 
importance to the agricultural agreement, which amends the 
complicated system of import regulations on significant markets, and 
improves the chances for Hungary's agricultural exports. 

   When the agreement takes effect, all signatories are to dismantle 
non-customs import restrictions, turning them into customs duties, 
which, in turn, are to be gradually reduced in six years.  In 
Hungary's import regulations, the average level of customs duties on 
agricultural products is to double, which, along with other 
mechanisms, will offer appropriate protection against import 
competition.  In the industrial sector, the agreement envisages an 
approximately 30-percent reduction of customs duties over five 
years.  Hungary undertook an obligation of a 28-percent reduction 
only.  "Hungary's active participation at the Uruguay Round and the 
results of the talks are in line with our endeavors to integrate 
Hungary's economy into the world economy," the ministry's report 
reads.  (Budapest MTI in English 0803 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   SHELL INVESTMENTS, OPERATIONS:  Shell and Interag Kf t (Ltd) will 
convert into a Shareholders' Company (RT) named Shell Hungary Rt as 
of January 1 next year.  The company will have registered capital of 
2.911 billion forints.  Royal Dutch/Shell has been the sole owner of 
the Kf t since it bought out Interag's minority stake in May. 
Shell's 87 filling stations in Hungary give it a 22 percent market 
share.  Shell invested about 4 billion forints in Hungary in 1992 
and 1993 and doubled the number of its filling stations over four 
years.  Shell and Interag Kf t expect turnover this year of around 
31 billion forints and after-tax profits of 650 million forints. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1722 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   HOLDING COMPANY TO DIRECT ALL IBUSZ FOREIGN OPERATIONS:  At the 
beginning of next year IBUSZ will establish a 100-percent-owned 
holding company, IBUSZ International, based in Vienna, to direct all 
the travel company's foreign operations.  IBUSZ International will 
take over from IBUSZ Rt in Budapest direct control of the 10 100- 
percent-owned foreign IBUSZ subsidiaries, probably from next 
February.  These 10, based in Austria, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, 
France, Germany, Britain, Poland, Sweden, Switzerland, and the 
United States, have a combined registered capital of under 100 
million forints and will see a combined turnover of 2 billion 
forints this year, 75 percent of which will come from services 
connected with Hungary.  IBUSZ international foresees similar 
turnover from Hungary-oriented services in 1994, while it expects 
significant expansion in its international activities. 

   The restucturing aimed at developing IBUSZ's foreign operations 
into an international agency network with extensive and diversified 
regional and local services throughout Central Europe.  As a result 
of the move, which will involve significant cost-cutting, IBUSZ's 
foreign operations are planned to break even in 1994 and may be in 
profit from 1995 on.  1993 is expected to see combined losses in 
excess of 100 million forints.  Some of IBUSZ's foreign 
subsidiaries, especially those in Austria and Germany, have become 
loss-making during the last two and a half years due to political 
and market changes.  IBUSZ Rt would have to inject some capital into 
setting up the new holding, the initial equity of which is yet to be 
decided.  Besides writing off part of the subsidiaries' losses, the 
parent company will also increase their low registered capital to 
strengthen their capital base and make future expansion possible. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0934 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   COLGATE-PALMOLIVE BUYS STAKE IN FABULON KFT:  Colgate-Palmolive 
Magyarorszag Termelo Kft (Ltd) has purchased the majority of the 
assets of Fabulon RG Kozmetikai Kf t from Richter Gedeon Vegyeszeti 
Gyar Rt (Richter Gedeon Chemical Works).  In July this year, Richter 
Gedeon established Fabulon Kozmetikai Kft as a subsidiary with a 
capital of 158 million forints.  The Kft, which makes the Fabulon, 
Fabulissimo, and Richtofit ranges of products, accounts for 1.5 to 2 
percent of Richter Gedeon's annual turnover.  Under a tender invited 
in September, bidders could bid for a majority stake in Fabulon Kft 
or could acquire a controlling stake through an equity increase. 
The tender attracted two bids but was declared unsuccessful. 
Earlier, Colgate-Palmolive bid unsuccessfully for the first 
privatization tender of Caola Kozmetikai Rt, which has a registered 
capital of 1.8 billion forints.  Gedeon Richter had net sales of 8.9 
billion forints in the first six months of this year.  (Budapest MTI 
in English 0752 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   EBRD SUBSCRIBES TO NEWLY ISSUED EGIS SHARES:  The newly issued 
shares of the pharmaceutical company EGIS with a nominal value of 
2.336 billion forints have been subscribed by the European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD), bringing the latter's stake 
to 30.003 percent.  The new share issue, which follows a decision to 
raise the company's equity made at a general meeting on November 27, 
brings the company's registered capital to 5.45 billion forints.  30 
percent of the shares will be introduced onto the Budapest Stock 
Exchange and a further 10-15 percent will be offered for open sale. 
The EBRD subsription will entitle EGIS to a 10-year tax concession 
of 100 percent in the first five years and 60 percent in the 
following five years. 

   EGIS expects net sales this year of 12.7 billion forints, 1 
million forints more than in 1992.  Pre-tax profits, however, are 
likely to be similar to last year's 1.4 billion forints.  First-half 
net sales this year were 5.84 billion forints, with pre-tax profits 
of 874 million forints.  Domestic sales are expected to be 7 billion 
forints this year, 1.5 billion forints up on last year.  Exports to 
ex-socialist countries are expected to be worth $30 million, the 
same as in 1992, while deliveries to western countries are expected 
to fall by $10 million to $32 million following the company's 
decision to discontinue exports of certain products.  EGIS expects 
turnover to grow further next year, and while it will continue to 
export to some 60 countries, the company expects future growth to 
come mainly from domestic sales.  The company's export policy is to 
maintain its Eastern European markets and to shift from basic 
materials to packaged medicines on Western markets.  At present, 
basic materials account for 75 percent of exports to Western 
countries.  (Budapest MTI in English 0758 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   ECONOMIC TALKS WITH RUSSIA:  Minister of International Economic 
Relations Bela Kadar and Russian Minister of External Economic 
Relations Oleg Davidov held talks on ways for Russia to repay its 
debts to Hungary.  As Hungary is a major importer of Russian crude 
and natural gas, the ministers surveyed how Hungary could increase 
its sales of oil and gas industry equipment to Russia.  They agreed 
that both governments should facilitate Hungarian and Russian 
investment in each other's countries.  (Budapest MTI in English 1520 
GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   EXPORTS TO DETERMINE ECONOMIC GROWTH, BANK OFFICIAL SAYS:  Next 
year's economic growth will be determined by the extent of export 
expansion.  If only domestic consumption expands, import will 
inevitably grow causing a further deterioration in the balance of 
payments and increase in debt, said Hungarian National Bank (MNB) 
Deputy Chairman Almos Kovacs.  For increasing exports, entrepreneurs 
should receive loans under more favorable terms.  The level of 
interests should be reduced.  The wide gap between interests on 
deposits and on loans may be expected to narrow owing to credit and 
debtor consolidation.  This measure, however, will only be effective 
if no more bad debts pile up at banks.  Banks, therefore, should 
feel that a fresh growth of bad debts may have unfavorable 
consequences.  Currently, the repayment of 300 billion forints of 
the 800 billion forints credit placed out at companies is doubtful. 
The privatization of banks may also help improve their situation. 
The fear that Hungarian owners may become the minority in the 
banking sphere is outdated.  Capital is becoming international 
everywhere and this does not pose any danger for Hungary, either. 
Foreign owners with sizeable capital may help the banks a lot. 
Budapest MTI in English 1815 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   MNB DECIDES ON STRICT MONETARY POLICY FOR 1994:  The central bank 
has set improving the country's external balances and reducing 
inflation as the most important goals in its monetary policy for 
next year.  To ensure a basis for steady economic growth, the first 
goal will be given priority, the Central Bank Council announced. 
The Council approved the 1994 monetary policy guidelines.  The 
Central Bank Council says it is extremely important to halt the rise 
in the country's external debt, since the longer it continues to 
increase, the more serious the measures that will have to be taken 
to reverse the trend.  The guidelines say that is why Hungary's 
balance of payments must be improved significantly, to the point 
where the current account deficit for next year does not exceed $1.5 
to 2 billion.  The national bank is calculating on an inflow of $1.5 
billion in working capital next year. 

   To achieve the two main goals, the central bank must pursue a 
strict monetary policy next year.  However, the goals cannot be 
achieved purely through monetary means and must also involve 
economic and fiscal policy.  If the necessary improvement does not 
materialize, the MNB will turn to the government to make the 
required adjustments.  The exchange rate policy must serve both 
goals, that is promote exports and support domestic production to 
cut imports, as well as to reduce inflation.  As a result, the 
central bank will have to strive to maintain the stability of the 
forint's exchange rate in real terms.  Regarding the central bank's 
interest rate policy, domestic demand for borrowing must be covered 
by domestic savings to the highest possible extent.  The central 
bank believes it is important to reduce financial expenses to reduce 
the interest margin in an environment where deposit interest rates 
will inevitably rise.  The decrease in withholding tax and measures 
taken in connection with the bank consolidation program are 
important steps towards a reduction in interest margins.  The 
Central Bank Council also agreed to secure limited refinancing on a 
temporary basis to promote exports within the framework of a strict 
monetary policy.  (Budapest MTI in English 1716 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   CENTRAL BANK COUNCIL CRITICAL OF 1994 BUDGET FINANCING:  The 1994 
budget approved on 14 December contains elements which are in 
contradiction to the spirit of the law on the central bank, the Bank 
Council said in a statement.  The contradiction is in regard to 
central bank financing of the budget as the budget has increased the 
upper limit on the amount of state securities that the MNB can 
purchase for 1994 and has placed an obligation on the central bank 
to guarantee to purchase state securities to that amount.  The 
Central Bank Council is concerned that these points, as well as the 
related amendment to the Central Bank Law, which amount to limiting 
the independence of the central bank, were included in the budget 
without prior consultation with the bank.  The council believes it 
is important to reiterate that the MNB's autonomy as laid down in 
the 1991 Central Bank Law is necessary for the central bank to 
operate in an effective manner with regard to monetary policy.  If a 
more extensive financing of the budget cannot be avoided, the 
central bank will use all the means at its disposal to compensate 
for the additional outflow of liquidity, the Central Bank Council 
statement says. 

   Under the budget, the increase in the stock of deficit-financing 
state bonds held by the central bank cannot exceed 80 billion 
forints on any one day next year.  Parliament has also amended the 
law on the central bank to that effect.  The 1991 law on the central 
bank set a decreasing limit on central bank financing of the budget 
in proportion to total budget revenues.  The limit for 1994 was set 
at 4 percent, corresponding to 52 billion forints, as total budget 
revenues are targeted at 1,308 billion forints.  Before the budget 
was passed, Hungarian National Bank (MNB) Chairman Akos Peter Bod 
wrote to the minister of finance and the head of the parliamentary 
committee warning of the conflict between the 80 billion forints 
limit in the budget and the limit under the law on the central bank. 
Bod said that unless the contradiction was eliminated, the central 
bank would proceed in accordance with the Central Bank Law. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1556 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   PROLIFERATION OF CONSULTING FIRMS:  About 20 percent of Hungarian 
companies seek out external advisory firms, but experts believe this 
proportion could be 25-30 percent within two or three years.  The 
300 advisory firms here work in various business fields.  The first 
Hungarian professional consultancy firms were set up at the end of 
the 1980's, and this was followed by the appearance of prominent 
foreign firms in Hungary.  The possibility that advisory firms could 
help a business in areas where the business does not have the 
appropriate overview or special knowledge, was not recognized in 
commerce until recently.  Groups giving advice to promote effective 
operation were first set up within individual ministries, through 
internal reorganization.  Various organizations, institutes and 
independent companies evolved from these, but they frequently lost 
touch with practice, mainly preparing analyses for social 
organizations and ministries, and providing little, and often 
inadequate professional advice to their customers. 

   Foreign expert and consultancy firms first came to Hungary in 
1989 and 1990, but many of them knew very little about Hungary's 
economy, and their advice was thus not always suitable or effective. 
Thus, another few years had to pass for a favorable impression to 
emerge of the professional service called consultancy.  At present, 
about 250-300 companies advertise as economic advisors but, in fact, 
only a third of them do the job full time.  Consultancy firms offer 
their services in the most varied areas, citing the spread of 
strategic thinking and the importance of developing organizations. 
The most widely known advisory specialized areas are personnel 
(workforce) consultancy and "head-hunting," public relations and 
marketing advice, financial and banking operation consultancy, and 
public affairs political-economic consultancy. 

   There are several world-famous foreign consultancy and expert 
firms that advise state companies and institutions.  These include 
Credit Suisse First Boston, which provides advice to the Hungarian 
Government.  The French Banque Paribas assists the work of the 
National Tourism Office.  Several companies use the professional 
assistance of Ernst and Young Accountants.  The London-based 
commercial bank, N.M. Rothschild, is the economic adviser to the 
State Assets Management Co. and the Hungarian Telecommunications Co. 
One of the most prestigious head-hunters, the U.S. firm Boyden, 
opened a Budapest office in 1992. 

   Some 10-15 Hungarian advisory firms also work nationwide.  Most 
of these were founded two to three years ago as private ventures by 
young economists and psychiatrists aged 35 to 40, and include the 
Coopsystem Organizational and Management Training Institute of the 
Budapest University of Economics, and the career advisory and senior 
manager consultancy firm of Dr. Jozsef Telkes.  Experts believe that 
consultancy as a service will become even more popular.  The fees, 
considered high in the service sector, will be pushed down by 
increasing competition, and firms will begin working in new 
professional areas, including crisis and bankruptcy management, time 
management, and professional advice covering franchise and multi- 
level marketing.  (Budapest MTI in English 1037 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   IBUSZ TO COOPERATE WITH AIR CANADA:  IBUSZ, Hungary's biggest 
travel agent, plans to establish close cooperation with Air Canada 
to increase its turnover in North America.  The company's Vienna- 
based affiliate, IBUSZ International, is to conclude a general sales 
agreement with Air Canada.  Accordingly, the Canadian firm will 
close its Viennese office and move to the IBUSZ office at 
Krugerstrasse.  Cooperation with Air Canada is expected to yield a 
turnover of 70-80 million Austrian shillings (ATS) for IBUSZ next 
year.  This year IBUSZ international expects to reach a turnover of 
ATS 450 million.  According to Austrian estimates, the parent 
company will have a turnover of ATS 1.15 billion.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 0924 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 
   JAPANESE EXIMBANK OFFERS 11-BILLION-YEN CREDIT LINE:  The Export- 
Import Bank of Japan has offered a new 11-billion-Japanese-yen (JPY) 
credit line to Hungary.  The Japanese Government is ready to express 
its support for the transformation of the Hungarian economy through 
the new credit line.  Hungarian enterprises have already used nearly 
all of an earlier JPY 13 billion credit line aimed at small and 
medium sized businesses granted by the Japanese Eximbank in December 
1992.  The Hungarian National Bank contributed an equal amount to 
the forint-denominated loans, which are refinanced from the fund 
opened by the Japanese Eximbank.  (Budapest MTI in English 1351 GMT 
22 Dec 93 AU) 

   POLAND 

   EXPECTATIONS FROM GATT AGREEMENT:  An article in the Poznan 
weekly WPROST on the GATT system commented on what Poland should 
expect from the recently concluded GATT agreement.  Transforming the 
Marxist thesis "practice is the criterion of truth" into "free trade 
is the criterion of truth," journalist Mariola Balicka notes that 
those who "produce the best and the cheapest" will "rake in the 
loot," and this applies to Poland as well.  Poland has a chance to 
increase next year's exports by $800 million because of the newly 
agreed upon trade decontrols in agricultural and textile products, 
but this depends on whether Poland keeps pace with international 
competition, "or whether we hide from competition behind a bolted 
door."  (Poznan WPROST in Polish No 52, 26 Dec 93 p 9) 

   LACK OF CAPITAL SAID TO IMPEDE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT:  The most 
important barrier to development is the small amount of national 
capital.  Foreign credits should supplement the activity of Polish 
banks, Finance Minister Marek Borowski told the Investment-Credit 
Forum on 16 December.  The minister added that inflation is a few 
percent lower than it was four years ago, and the zloty can now be 
exchanged for western currencies.  The IMF mission that has just 
left Poland appreciated our macroeconomic coefficients, he said. 
The upward tendency may break down, however, if there are no 
sufficient financing sources, Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz, president of 
the National Bank of Poland, said.  She warned against inconsiderate 
money borrowing for investments that may burden national banks and 
the State Treasury, which is a guarantor for credits.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1327 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   RAIFFEISEN CENTROBANK OPENS BRANCH IN POZNAN:  The Austrian 
Raiffeisen Centrobank has opened its third Polish branch in Poznan. 
The opening took place on 16 December.  The two other branches are 
in Gdansk and Katowice, while the bank's headquarters opened in 
Warsaw in 1991.  The Bank's main customers are Polish enterprises 
and banks having limited rights in international financial turnover. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1400 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   GENERAL MOTORS COOPERATION WITH FSO:  Two General Motors 
subsidiaries, Packard Electric and Inland Fisher Guide Divisions, 
and the Polish car maker FSO's branch in Elk, Suwalki Province, have 
signed a memorandum on starting negotiations to establish a joint 
venture company.  Jerzy Kownacki, director of General Motors Poland, 
told PAP that they want to start the joint production of conductors, 
lighting elements, and parts of wood and metal.  Under the agreement 
signed with FSO on December 13, General Motors Europe committed 
itself to provide FSO subsidiaries and branches with the opportunity 
to enter the GM subsidiary system.  FSO spokesman Andrzej Smolinski 
told PAP that the factory's branch in Elk has become the biggest 
permanent Polish subsidiary of western car-makers such as Mercedes 
and Fiat.  Henryk Kucera, marketing director of tire manufacturer 
Stomil SA, said that the firm was entered in the register of 
official GM suppliers.  He did not want to disclose the amount of 
the contract, saying that the talks will be concluded next year. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1652 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   NEW OPEL VAN ENTERS POLISH MARKET:  General Motors Poland has 
presented a new model that will be on sale in Poland.  It is a small 
van built on the chassis of the Opel Corsa and with a price tag of 
Z260 million (ca. $13,000).  John Passadis of GM Poland told 
reporters that Opel accounted for 13 percent of imported cars 
delivered to Poland during the January-October period of this year. 
This gives the company second place after the Italian Fiat which has 
a 30-percent share of the imported car market.  In absolute figures, 
Opel sold 9,235 cars, while Fiat sold some 22,000, Passadis said. 
Referring to the contract between GM Europe and FSO car maker of 
Warsaw signed December 13, he said that the planned assembly of 
10,000 Astras in Warsaw by a joint venture established by the two 
companies should fully satisfy the Polish demand for this model. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1713 GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   LACK OF FINANCING FOR STEEL INDUSTRY RESTRUCTURING:  The European 
Union (EU) appreciates the problems of the restructuring of the 
Polish steel industry and agrees to extend technical assistance and 
credits from international institutions, but refuses to offer a 
direct support from its budget, according to deputy minister of 
industry Stanislaw Padykula.  Padykula was speaking after a meeting 
of representatives of the Polish Government and the steel industry 
at the European Commission in Brussels.  According to Padykula, 
Poland is the most advanced central European country in the 
restructuring of the steel industry.  He noted that the 
implementation of the restructuring program depends on the influx of 
capital.  The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development has 
pledged to support the restructuring in the form of credits for 
concrete firms while the World- Bank has vowed to-assist the 
restructuring of employment, he said.  These sums are, however, 
insufficient despite a considerable contribution from domestic 
sources.  The overall cost of the restructuring is estimated at $4.5 
billion.  There were some 123,000 people employed in the Polish 
steel industry in 1991, compared to 100,000 at present.  In the year 
2002, employment in this industry is expected to fall below 43,000 
people.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1725 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   PROBLEMS OF SMALL BUSINESS SECTOR:  Polish small business is in 
deep crisis and needs support and protection from the government, 
new chairman of the Polish Small Business Union Kazimierz 
Modzelewski told journalists following the conclusion of the 2nd 
congress of Polish small business.  The delegates to the congress, 
representing 914 small business organizations, elected new 
authorities of the Union and adopted its statutes.  The delegates 
agreed that small business needs investment relief, a stable tax 
system and efficient banking system.  They also spoke of the need to 
work out a system of credit guarantees to give small firms access to 
new technologies and enable them to participate in privatisation. 
The participants in the congress stressed the necessity to create a 
system of information about foreign partners and to promote Polish 
small business products in the West.  The debates were attended by 
Sejm speaker Jozef Oleksy.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1839 GMT 16 Dec 
93 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT INCREASES IN NOVEMBER:  Industrial production 
rose by 2.1 percent in November against October and was 9.8 percent 
higher than a year ago.  However, the performance of construction 
and assembly plants was worse in November compared to the previous 
month, with their output decreasing by 11.8 percent.  These are 
figures released by the Central Statistical Office on 16 December. 
Also, as compared with November 1992, a 1.7 percent fall in 
production of the extraction industry was noted, while the output of 
the processing industry and the construction sector rose by 10.7 and 
8 percent, respectively.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2103 GMT 16 Dec 93 
AU) 

   NEW DIGITAL TELEPHONE EXCHANGE INAUGURATED:  Telecommunications 
in Warsaw will attain world a standard by 1997, the director of the 
Warsaw branch of Telekomunikacja Polska (Polish Telecommunications) 
Andrzej Moszkiewicz said on 16 December while inaugurating a new 
digital telephone exchange in Poland's capital.  President of the 
company Zdzislaw Nowak said that during the two years of its 
existence, the company's management has worked out strategic plans 
up to the year 2000, introduced new services, completed the 
construction of an international network, and established 
cooperation with telecommunications of neighboring countries. 
Thanks to the new telephone exchange, Warsaw's central district has 
received an additional 20,000 telephone numbers.  By 1996, Warsaw, 
with its population of 1.6 million, will have 900,000 telephone 
subscribers, according to Moszkiewicz.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2300 
GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK LOAN TO COVER BUDGET DEFICIT:  The National Bank of 
Poland (NBP) will lend the government 30 trillion zlotys (Z) ($1.5 
billion) to cover the budget deficit in 1994.  A further loan of Z5 
trillion, which the government is applying for, might cause a 4 
percent rise in inflation, said NPB president Hanna Gronkiewicz- 
Waltz said in an interview for the Third Radio channel.  The 1994 
budget deficit, which is to reach Z80 trillion, may be reduced by an 
introduction of credit limits, she added.  Gronkiewicz-Waltz 
anticipates that monthly inflation next year will be maintained at 
1.6 percent, which makes over 20 percent a year, Gronkiewicz 
explained.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1314 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   INVESTMENT BY KRAFT JACOBS SUCHARD:  Kraf t Jacobs Suchard has 
invested in Poland for the second time by establishing "Kraf t 
Chorzele," a joint venture company for cream cheese production, with 
a dairy cooperative in Chorzele, Ostroleka province.  The 
investment, worth Z60 billion (almost $3 million) ensures Jacobs 77 
percent of the new company shares.  The cooperative will provide the 
new company with one third of its assets, chairman of the 
cooperative Stanislaw Zeranski told a press conference in Warsaw on 
17 December.  Within two years, Jacobs is expected to invest $16.6 
million more in the modernization of production.  The company is to 
produce cheese with the Kraf t trade mark for home and foreign 
markets.  The firm aspires to employ 140 workers.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1916 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   POLISH-SWEDISH GROUP SEEKS TV LICENSE:  Top Canal Media, a 
Polish-Swedish company set up last month, is among the ten 
contenders for the sole license to broadcast television nationally 
in Poland.  Sixty-seven percent of the shares in the venture are 
owned by Jacek Zelezik, a Polish TV broadcaster who currently 
operates a Warsaw-based local station.  AB Kinnevik and Atrium, both 
of Sweden, own 30 and 3 percent of the shares Top Canal Media 
respectively.  Kinnevik has invested in TV broadcasting in Sweden, 
Denmark and Norway and, most recently, in Estonia.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1710 GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   AGRICULTURE MINISTER OUTLINES PRIORITIES:  Agriculture Minister 
Andrzej Smietanko said in Bialystok on 19 December that the creation 
of appropriate legal conditions for agricultural activity, the 
restructuring of food industry debts, and ensuring budgetary 
resources for activating agriculture are the main "things to be 
done" by the ministry.  The passing of a law on equalizing payments 
is a legal precondition for the good functioning of Polish 
agriculture.  While restructuring debts of agricultural enterprises, 
it is necessary to make sure, simultaneously, that farmers will have 
a 20 percent share in these enterprises, said Smietanko, adding that 
farmers would then be interested in the fate of restructured 
enterprises to which they deliver foodstuffs.  Food producers will 
get shares in firms on the same principles as the workforces of 
enterprises privatized within the framework of the state enterprise 
pact, said the minister.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1847 GMT 19 Dec 93 
AU) 

   UNION OF MEAT PRODUCERS FORMED:  The Polish Union of Producers, 
Exporters, and Importers of Meat was set up on 21 December.  The 
idea was initiated by representatives of meat plants and exporters 
of meat and meat products.  The union aims to eliminate competition 
among Poles on foreign markets, promote Polish products and 
services, help initiate modern methods of animal husbandry in 
Poland, prepare analyses and forecasts concerning the meat market, 
and represent the interests of the meat industry vis?a?vis the state 
                                                   ? ? 
administration.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1648 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   BRITAIN DONATES $75 MILLION FOR BANK PRIVATIZATION FUND:  British 
Ambassador to Poland Michael Llewellyn-Smith and Deputy Finance 
Minister Ryszard Michalski signed an agreement on 21 December to 
make $75 million available to the Polish bank privatization fund. 
The money originally formed part of the United Kingdom's $100 
million contribution to the Polish zloty stabilization fund.  In 
1992, the UK, along with other international donors, agreed to 
contribute the major part of its contribution to that fund to the 
process of privatizing Polish banks.  Some donors had not agreed and 
withdrew their contributions, including Germany and Italy, who 
withdrew $200 and $100 million resppectively.  Great Britain has 
donated $8 million for technical assistance to the bad debts 
departments of "Bank Depozytowo-Kredytowy" in Lublin, "Powszechny 
Bank Gospodarczy" in Lodz, and "Bank Zachodni" in Wroclaw.  Some $17 
million will be used as restructuring assistance to state-run 
enterprises, while the $19 million interest accrued on the $100 
million will be spent on the promotion of small and medium-size 
companies in Lublin and Bialystok. 

   Poland signed a memorandum to set up the Polish bank 
privatization fund in December 1992.  Michalski said that the $1 
billion stabilization fund has existed for two years, but Poland 
failed to draw on the fund's money and wanted to allocate it for the 
privatization of banks.  "This is a huge multi-billion dollar 
project," he argued.  Poland asked the New York-based Federal 
Reserve Bank to transfer the money to the bank privatiztion fund. 
It will be transferred provided Poland "has signed bilateral 
agreements with individual countries."  Some $600 million have been 
placed on the fund's account so far.  "We will be glad if we manage 
to collect some $800 million," Michalski added.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1708 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   U.S. COMPANY BUYS 36-PERCENT STAKE IN GLASSWORKS:  The U.S. 
company Owens-Illinois Inc. has bought a 36-percent stake in the 
Jaroslaw glassworks for $3.15 million.  Twenty percent of the shares 
will be sold to the workforce at a discount, the press office of the 
Privatization Ministry announced on 21 December.  The State Treasury 
has retained the rest of shares but is expected to sell its package 
to the U.S. investor within six years.  Under the agreement, the 
U.S. buyer has increased the glassworks' stock capital by $14.05 
million and, as a result, will own 75 percent of the shares.  The 
money obtained from the recapitalization will be used to repay the 
glassworks' loans and liabilities, amounting to some Z290 billion 
(some $14 million).  The U.S. investors will make $25 million in 
investments over a period of 5 years.  Owens-Illinois Inc, the 
world's biggest packaging glass manufacturer, pledges to maintain 
employment and social security benefits at the present level.  A pay 
rise will be also included in the package.  Under the October 1993 
agreement on technical assistance, Owens-Illinois Inc., with a 
network of 30 plants and a 1992 turnover of $3.8 billion, will 
provide the Polish glassworks with new technology of manufacturing 
and selling glass containers.  The modernization will save some 400 
jobs.  The glassworks in Jaroslaw, southeastern Poland, makes 
bottles and jars of colorless and orange glass.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1747 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   ROMANIA 

   OTOPENI AIRPORT MODERNIZATION:  Bucharest's Otopeni International 
Airport has inaugurated a modern passenger departure section, fitted 
with facilities on a par with European requirements.  The departure 
line consists of 12 check-in counters provided with conveyor belts 
and electronic ticket reading and luggage weighing machines, all 
made in Germany, and eight customs checkpoints.  The section 
includes a waiting room for VIP's; its air-conditioning, closed- 
circuit television, and other conveniences have also been brought up 
to date.  The modernization project was entirely designed by 
Romanian experts.  Another program, worth $70 million, will equip 
Otopeni with new installations, refurbish its runways, add outdoor 
parking platforms for planes, build a new air-station, extend car 
parks, access roads, and so forth.  When the project is completed, 
Otopeni International Airport will have doubled its capacity, 
enabling it to meet the demands of the next two decades.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 1511 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   WOOD-PROCESSING INDUSTRY IN 1993:  Production growth in the four 
sub-branches of the wood-processing industry (exploitation of timber 
and its primary processing, manufacturing of furniture, pulp and 
paper, glass, and fine ceramic goods) has registered 6-percent 
growth, while exports increased by 5.6 percent compared to 1992, 
Marin Nicolae, state secretary in the Ministry of Industry, said in 
a recent interview.  He also emphasized the concern of the economic 
units in that sector with developing a profitable market in Romania, 
meaning by that the development of a furniture manufacturing 
industry with new job opportunities.  Another success registered in 
1993 was the recapture of several foreign markets, such as the one 
in the Russian Federation, where two furniture exhibitions were 
recently organized in Moscow and Krasnoyarsk; next year, similar 
exhibitions are scheduled to be held in Baku and Saint Petersburg. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0919 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION FIGURES:  According to the data provided by 
the National Statistics Board (INS) industrial production in October 
1993 was 0.3 percent higher than the previous month; if the number 
of overall working days is taken into account, it was actually 3.2 
percent higher.  Compared to October 1992, the increases registered 
in October 1993 were 7.4 percent and 11.9 percent respectively, 
which leads to a total production for the first 10 months of 1993 
approximating the production of the first 10 months of 1992. 
Likewise, production in the mining sector rose 1.3 percent, in the 
energy sector 5.9 percent, while the processing industry recorded a 
slight regress.  By the end of October 1993, the number of employees 
in industry was 2,544,500, that is 15,700 less than September 30. 
Productivity for the first 10 months of 1993 was 7.7 percent higher 
than the first ten months of 1992. 

   The foreign trade figures for October registered a fall, compared 
to September, both in exports and imports.  Hard currency exports 
totaled $451 million, that is 22.7 percent less than September, but 
22.5 percent more than in October 1992.  Imports totalled in October 
$471.3 million, that is 15.8 percent less than in September, but 1.7 
percent more than October 1992.  The trade balance for October 
registered a $20.3 million deficit.  For the first 10 months of 
1993, both exports and imports registered increases compared with 
the first 10 months of 1992.  Hard currency exports totalled 
$3,617.6 million (8.5 percent), while imports amounted to $4,232.6 
million (6.1 percent), which led to a $615 million trade deficit. 
The average nominal net salary in October was 6.7 percent higher 
than September and 3.3 times higher than October 1990, when the 
price liberalization started.  The ratio of the average nominal net 
salary versus the consumer price index for the first 10 months of 
1993 was 87.6 percent, compared with the same period of 1992.  The 
ratio in October was 91.7 percent compared to September; 79.9 
percent compared to October 1992; and 54.4 percent compared to 
October 1990.  The number of unemployed by 15 November was 
1,075,253, that is equivalent to an unemployment rate of 9.4 
percent.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1529 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL INVESTMENTS IN 1994:  According to the Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food, proposed investments in agriculture for 1994 
total some 69.25 billion lei.  Most of the proposed investments are 
designed for ongoing work on 234 projects amounting to 47,063.053 
million lei, but there will also be some 103 new projects, worth 
8,709.353 billion lei.  The investment program also stipulates 3,670 
million lei for loans.  The main entries in the 1994 plan are 
irrigation works, draining and soil erosion control, flood 
prevention, and pest control.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1712 
GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   CRISIS IN VITICULTURE:  Wines have turned for Romanians from 
consumer goods into luxury goods, told a news conference Viorel 
Stoian, director of the Valea Calugareasca Institute of Vine-Growing 
and Vinification Research.  Romania, the world's eighth vine-growing 
country, is undergoing a crisis in this domain, he said, showing 
that the vineyards have been steadily shrinked ever since 1980, as 
numerous areas cultivated to vine were given other uses.  In 1993, 
Romania has only 245,000 hectares cultivated with productive vine, 
as compared with about 300,000 hectares in 1970.  The production has 
kept at low levels these last few years, that is 3,760 kg of grapes 
per hectare in 1991 and 3,845 kg in 1992.  The upkeep of the 
vineyards is rather unsatisfactory in the private sector that 
currently holds 73.2 per cent of the total area.  The causes of this 
situation are the big expenditures taken to start and maintain noble 
strains, which are hard for private producers to bear, as well as 
the tough credit system.  The high cost of production shows in the 
sale price, Viorel Stoian stressed, adding that the fate of Romanian 
vine-growing depended decisively on the support the state gives this 
sector.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English  1025 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   GERMAN FIRM TO OVERSEE POLLUTION, QUALITY CONTROL:  Upon request 
of the Romanian state, the German TUV Bayern Company has opened its 
representation office in Bucharest.  Its activity is based on 
pollution-control technologies.  The company is to carry out 
controls, together with Romanian experts trained in Munich, on 
equipment in Romanian enterprises.  Periodic check-ups and equipment 
testing to observe the standards of environment protection will be 
carried out in Romanian laboratories properly equipped for testing 
operations.  After passing the tests, various industrial products 
are to receive quality certificates that will help them enter 
markets in Europe and the United States.  Moreover, the company has 
the role to find out irregularities regarding the quality of 
equipment and their products.  In that case, enterprises should 
inform the experts that are to study the case that are to bring 
solutions for recovery.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0834 GMT 21 
Dec 93 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   CONSTRUCTION OF GAS PIPELINE BEGINS:  The construction of a 42-km 
gas pipeline from Surany to Vrable officially started on 3 December. 
The investor of the project, which is expected to cost 142 million 
Slovak korunas (Sk), is the SPP (Slovak Gas Works) Bratislava 
company.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 4 Dec 93 p 4 AU) 

   EARNINGS IN AGRICULTURE LAG:  Average nominal monthly earnings in 
agriculture increased 6.6 percent in the first half of 1993, 
compared with a 22 percent increase in the industrial sector.  The 
agricultural work force shrunk by 32,500 people in the first half of 
the year.  Representatives of the strongest agricultural union in 
Slovakia warn that, if the agricultural budget is passed in the form 
proposed by the government, farmers will be forced to raise the 
procurement prices of slaughter animals, potatoes, wheat, and milk 
by an average of 15 percent.  The government's draft budget for 1994 
provides for Sk6.75 billion in agricultural subsidies, plus Sk65O 
million for the Agricultural Market Regulation Fund, while the 
government's own "Green Report" reckoned with Sk11.1 billion in 
agricultural subsidies.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 6 Dec 93 p 3 
AU) 

   FARMS' SITUATION KEEPS DETERIORATING:  The value of the financial 
assets of private farms declined by another Sk800 million in the 
first half of 1993, that is, by one-third, while the value of the 
financial assets of state farms declined by Sk413 million, that is, 
44 percent.  The volume of loans of enterprises involved in primary 
agricultural production, on the other hand, increased by Sk1 billion 
and almost 50 percent of them are facing bankruptcy.  In the first 
half of the year, another 32,000 people left agriculture and the 
share of agricultural workers in the number of unemployed has 
reached 20 percent.  These figures were presented by Jozef Juhas, 
chairman of the Slovak Agricultural and Food Chamber (SPPK), at the 
Third SPPK General Assembly.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 9 Dec 93 
p 5 AU) 

   TIMBER EXPORTS TO GO UP:  Export of timber continues to be 
regulated and subject to export licenses.  According to Jozef 
Konopka, director of the forestry section at the Slovak Ministry of 
Agriculture, licenses for the export of a maximum of 600,000 cubic 
meters of timber from state and private forests will be issued in 
1994.  This represents 12 percent of total annual timber cutting, 
which will amount to approximately 4.8 million cubic meters next 
year.  In 1992 administrators and owners of forests exported 140,000 
cubic meters of timber.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 7 Dec 93 p 
2 AU) 

   KOMARNO SHIPYARDS DOUBLE PRODUCTION:  The Slovenske Lodenice 
(Slovak Shipyards) Komarno company has already concluded Sk3 billion 
worth of contracts for 1994, which is twice its production volume of 
1992, Ladislav Lichtenberg, the company's commercial director, 
announced.  The Komarno shipyards have become the "most important 
producer of coasters in the under-4000-ton category in Europe," 
Lichtenberg said.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 7 Dec 93 
p 2 AU) 

   COCA COLA BUYS SOFT-DRINKS PLANT:  The Coca Cola Amatil Slovakia 
company and the Aqua Fresh company in Luka near Piestany, producer 
of mineral water and water for infants, have concluded an agreement, 
under which Coca Cola purchased Aqua Fresh's assets.  Following 
necessary investments, the plant will produce beverages of the Coca 
Cola company for the domestic market.  It will also continue 
bottling "Lucka" mineral water.  The transfer of all Aqua Fresh 
employees to Coca Cola Amatil Slovakia is part of the contract. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 8 Dec 93 p 1 AU)  The first 
production plant of the Coca Cola Amatil company in Slovakia opened 
in Luka on 8 December.  It will satisfy the growing demand for the 
company's beverages on the Slovak market.  (Bratislava SMENA in 
Slovak 9 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   TEXTILE JOINT VENTURE APPROVED:  On 7 December the Slovak 
Government approved the founding of a joint venture by the Trikota 
Vrbove company and the Italian Nuova Iva company.  The joint 
venture, called Andrea, has a capital stock of Sk10O,O00, 80 percent 
of which came from the Italian partner.  It will produce ladies' 
lingerie, initially for the German and Italian markets and, 
subsequently, for the Slovak and Czech markets as well.  In the 
initial phase, the joint venture will build four workshops for 45 
employees.  Eventually, the number of employees is to increase to 
200.  In the first year of operations, the company expects to make a 
pre-tax profit of over Sk3.7 million.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 8 Dec 93 p 2 AU)  The joint venture between the Trikota 
Vrbove state enterprise and the Italian Nuova Iva company, a member 
of the Gruppo Perla consortium and one of the most important 
producers of underwear, was set up on 9 December.  The joint venture 
will operate production plants at Vrbove and Sala.  The Italian 
partner has invested Sk17 million in the venture in the form of 
machinery, know-how, and financial capital.  The venture, called 
Andrea, will specialize in the production of swimsuits and lingerie 
based on Du Pont's Lycra Jersey fiber.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 13 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   TAXPAYERS OWE STATE OVER SK13 BILLION:  According to a report on 
the results of an inquiry into the operations of the state internal 
revenue administration, which was discussed by the Slovak Government 
on 7 December, outstanding tax payments had reached the sum of 
Sk13.2 billion by 30 September 1993.  Within the framework of their 
audits, internal revenue authorities levied additional tax payments, 
including fines, of Sk2.888 billion in the first nine months of the 
year.  Only Sk1.058 billion, that is, 36.6 percent of the arrears, 
has actually been paid by the taxpayers.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 8 Dec 93 pp 2, 5 AU) 

   RAILROADS STOP SERVING INDEBTED COMPANIES:  Gabriel Rybar, press 
secretary of the Slovak Railroads (ZSR), told the daily NARODNA 
OBRODA that, with effect from 8 December, the ZSR would stop making 
available its freight cars to 46 Slovak companies that are its 
biggest debtors.  The ZSR will cancel its decision only after the 
companies settle their debts, Rybar said.  The ZSR's claims against 
customers have reached the sum of Sk3.7 billion, while the ZSR 
itself owes other organizations Sk2.4 billion.  At the end of May, 
the ZSR's claims stood at only Sk2.4 billion, which shows their 
rapid rise in the last couple of months.  According to Rybar, the 
ZSR is unable to pay its suppliers' bills and currently pays only 
for electricity and diesel fuel.  It has also had to discontinue 485 
investment projects because it has received from the state budget 
funds for the reconstruction of only 17 km of tracks.  The companies 
affected include Duslo Sala, Chemko Strazske, the Ziar nad Hronom 
aluminum works, the Novaky Chemical Works, the Ruzomberok Paper and 
Pulp Mill, and Istrochem Bratislava.  Rybar hopes that the ZSR's 
decision would be only "temporary" and that a solution would be 
found by the end of the year.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 
8 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   COMPANY SETS UP OFFICE IN CHINA:  Kerametal AS has opened a 
representative office in Shanghai.  It is the Bratislava company's 
fifth representative office abroad, after those in Germany, the 
United States, the Czech Republic, and Switzerland.  According to 
Vladimir Duris, the company's assistant director general, the 
opening of the Shanghai office comes in reaction to the assessment 
of Kerametal's interests and opportunities in the Chinese market. 
Kerametal, which will celebrate its 25th anniversary in 1994, 
expects this year revenues slightly above last year's Sk6 billion. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   BAN ON IMPORTING CZECH POTATOES WAIVED:  The ban on the 
distribution of potatoes imported from the Czech Republic will be 
abolished with effect from 13 December 1993, while the ban on 
importing potatoes from other countries remains in force, the 
Central Agricultural Inspection and Testing Institute (UKSUP) 
announced.  The importer must furnish a certificate issued by the 
Czech Republic's Agricultural and Food Inspection Authority that the 
shipment does not contain the golden nematode.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   UTILITY-VEHICLE MAKER HIT BY CZECHOSLOVAKIA'S DIVISION:  TAZ 
(Trnava Automobile Works) a.s., which produces S1203 utility 
vehicles in seven different modifications, clutches for passenger 
cars and trucks, and axles and other components for Tatra 815 
trucks, has had to lay off 300 people since May and employs now 
2,900 people.  The reason is that Tatra Koprivnice, the main 
customer, had suspended production until July and sales of 51203 
utility vehicles have been reduced to almost one-half.  Last year, 
TAZ produced 4,715 S1203 automobiles, 65 percent of which were 
exported to the Czech Republic.  This year only 100 S1203 
automobiles will be sold in the Czech Republic.  Sales on the Slovak 
market have been affected by customers' insolvency.  Slovak health 
care, for example, would need 130 ambulance cars but will be able to 
purchase only 30 this year.  In the first nine months of the year, 
TAZ made a profit of only Sk1.2 million, compared with last year's 
27 million.  Fifty one percent of TAZ shares are owned by the 
National Property Fund of the Slovak Republic, 30 percent by 
individual holders of investment coupons, and the remainder by 
investment funds.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 9 Dec 93 
p 2 AU) 

   LAYOFFS IN TANK FACTORY:  The more than 5,000 employees of the 
ZTS Turcianske Strojarne Martin state enterprise will stay at home 
from 18 December to 10 January 1994, owing to the company's 
difficult economic situation.  The company is owed more than Sk3 
billion by its customers, which makes it difficult for it to 
purchase materials and energy.  This month, the company has even had 
to start regulating the consumption of electricity.  During the 
extended Christmas leave, only 350 to 400 workers will come to work 
to complete orders, the sale and financing of which are guaranteed. 
One of the biggest debtors of ZTS is the Motokov Prague company with 
a debt of 500 million korunas.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 10 Dec 93 
p 2 AU) 

   PER-CAPITA HEALTH CARE SPENDING HALF OF CZECH LEVEL:  The draft 
state budget for 1994 earmarks Sk15.764 billion (about $500 million) 
for health care, which is considered absolutely insufficient by the 
Administration of the Health Insurance Fund.  According to M. 
Jancovicova, director of the Administration of the Health Insurance 
Fund, the fund would need a minimum of Sk22.56 billion next year. 
Health Minister Irena Belohorska says, however, that she does not 
want to claim more funding in 1994 than her ministry had been 
allocated by the draft state budget.  She said she would raise the 
claims only if the tax revenues developed better than generally 
expected.  She added that she saw reserves in more efficient 
exploitation of the finances the system had at its disposal.  The 
Czech budget for 1994 has designated 73 billion Czech korunas 
(almost $2.5 billion) for the health care area, almost five-times 
more than the Slovak budget, though the Czech Republic's population 
is only twice as large as that of Slovakia.  (Bratislava SME in 
Slovak 10 Dec 93 pp 1, 2; Prague CTK in English 13 Dec 93 AU) 

   TEACHERS WARN AGAINST CUTS IN EDUCATION BUDGET:  In a joint 
statement addressed to Slovak Parliament, the Conference of Rectors 
of Slovak Higher Educational Establishments, the chairmen of 
Academic Senates, and the Trade Union of Workers in Education and 
Science warned that the submitted draft budget for education in 1994 
"will lead to the devastation of education."  The signatories 
pointed out that the proposed cuts would reduce material 
expenditures to 71.7 percent of the 1993 level and 37.3 percent of 
the 1992 level, while expenditures on maintenance and repairs would 
be cut to 32 percent of the 1993 level and 17 percent of the 1992 
level.  The earmarked investment resources would cover only 20 
percent of needs and allow the completion of only four projects 
under construction.  The wage resources appropriated by the budget 
represent only 87 percent of the 1993 resources, "which does not 
cover even the legal claim to tariff wages and could lead to the 
discharge of 22,000 employees in education," the signatories warn. 
(Bratislava SME in Slovak 10 Dec 93 p 2 AU)  Juraj Svec, rector of 
Bratislava's Comenius University, said on 14 December that the 
education sector would need Sk33.6 billion in 1994, but will get 
only Sk17.4 billion, 36 percent less than in 1992.  Kamil Vajnorsky, 
chairman of the Trade Union of Workers in Education and Science, 
said that, owing to the budget cuts, the education sector is 
threatened with a 25 percent reduction in real earnings next year 
and with the loss of 15,000 to 22,000 jobs.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 15 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   SWINE FEVER:  Swine fever has been diagnosed in the pig stock of 
a private farmer at Chramec, Rimavska Sobota district.  The probable 
source of the infection is wild boars.  The District Veterinary 
Administration at Rimavska Sobota ensured the physical liquidation 
of all animals in the pig stock and staked out protective zones. 
Extraordinary veterinary measures have been adopted.  (Bratislava 
PRAVDA in Slovak 13 Dec 93 p 16 AU) 

   PORK EXPORTS BANNED:  In view of the recent occurrence of swine 
fever in Rimavska Sobota district, all exports of pork and wild boar 
meat from Slovakia have been banned.  According to Jozef Hojsik from 
the State Veterinary Administration, exports might be resumed after 
six months to one year.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 13 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   SLOVAK-HUNGARIAN JOINT VENTURES:  A total of 345 companies with 
Hungarian capital participation are registered in the Slovak 
Republic, 41 of which are 100-percent Hungarian-owneD.  The 
Hungarian partners' stakes in these companies total $2.1 million. 
(Bratislava SME in Slovak 29 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   ENERGY COMPANY CUTS DELIVERIES TO DEBTORS:  The Slovak Energy 
Company (SEP) announced that, starting with the 49th week of the 
year, it will reduce the amount of electricity delivered to its 
"biggest debtors" by about 10 percent.  According to SEP Secretary 
General Rudolf Kvetan, the SEP is owed between 2.5 and 3 billion 
Slovak korunas (Sk) by its customers.  The single biggest debtor, 
with unpaid bills of Sk250 million, is the Duslo Sala company. 
Kvetan stressed that no limitations were planned in deliveries to 
health care and educational facilities.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 30 Nov 93 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   BRUSSELS CONFERENCE ON ARMS INDUSTRY CONVERSION:  An 
international conference on conversion of the Slovak arms industry 
was held in Brussels on 29-30 November.  The organizers from the 
European Union and the Slovak Ministry of Economy invited to it 
representatives of 23 Slovak companies engaged in "heavy and special 
engineering" and representatives of more than 200 West European 
companies.  The aim of the conference, which was attended by Deputy 
Prime Minister Jozef Prokes, was to mediate contacts between Slovak 
companies and West European partners and to provide West European 
companies with information on the Slovak economy, conditions for 
foreign investors, the system of taxation, and conversion programs. 
The Slovak side seeks foreign participation in Slovak firms 
undergoing conversion, either in the form of joint ventures or 
purchase of shares.  Each Slovak company participating in the 
conference held separate talks with representatives of 6 to 10 
Western firms, which included companies such as Siemens and 
Aerospatiale.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 30 Nov 93 p 
1; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   NEW INTERNATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS RATES INTRODUCED:  As of 1 
December, the Czech Republic is ranked in Slovakia in the first 
international telecommunications tariff zone, in which one pulse is 
15 seconds and the rate per minute, including VAT, is 6.30 Slovak 
korunas (Sk) Slovak Television announced on 1 December.  Hungary, 
Poland, and Austria rank in the second tariff zone; Romania, 
Germany, Armenia, Bulgaria, and Belarus are among countries ranked 
in the third tariff zone; and Russia, Georgia, and Azerbaijan are in 
the fourth zone.  One pulse in automatic international calls costs 
Sk1.5, and in calls from a public telephone box Sk2.0.  Changes in 
ranking countries in tariff zones also affect telegraph and 
teleprinter services, the television said, but did not specify. 
(Prague CTK in English 1 Dec 93 AU) 

   ADIDAS DEPARTS IN SEARCH OF CHEAPER LABOR:  Almost 10 years of 
cooperation between Adidas and the ZDA Partizanske shoe factory will 
come to an end in January 1994 when the sports-gear manufacturer 
will transfer the production of sports shoes to Vietnam.  According 
to Milan Oravec, ZDA's deputy director in charge of commerce, 
Adidas' decision means the loss of 300 jobs in ZDA's Zlate Moravce 
plant that used to produce up to 500,000 pairs of Adidas sports 
shoes annually.  Oravec is optimistic, however, that the company 
will find alternative markets for its shoes.  Thanks to deliveries 
for Italian partners and the domestic market, the entire capacity of 
the Zlate Moravce plant will be utilized until the end of the year. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 3 Dec 93 p 4; Bratislava SME in 
Slovak 2 Dec 93 p 1 AU)  After 12 years of cooperation, four 
workshops of the JAS Bardejov state enterprise will stop working for 
Adidas at the beginning of February.  Some 600 JAS Bardejov 
employees have been producing 700,000 Adidas sports shoes annually, 
about 20 percent of the company's total output.  The JAS management 
is holding talks with other world producers, including PUMA, to 
utilize its vacant capacity.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 4 Dec 
93 p 4 AU) 

   GROWING GAP BETWEEN LOW-INCOME, OTHER HOUSEHOLDS:  According to 
Slovak Statistical Office data, the gap between low-income 
households and other households is widening.  While the income of 
"better-situated" households was 22.3 percent higher in the second 
quarter of 1993 than in 1992 and reached Sk3,054 per capita, the 
income of low-income households (with an income of under Sk2,0O0 per 
household member, the official sustenance level) increased only 9.7 
percent, to Sk1,888 per capita.  The physical volume of purchases by 
all households declined 9.9 percent, but purchases by low-income 
households declined 16.8 percent.  According to updated Slovak 
Statistical Office data, there are now 693,000 Slovak households 
with 2,581,000 members whose per-capita income is under Sk2,OO0 per 
month.  This represents 39 percent of all Slovak households and 49 
percent of the population.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 1 Dec 933 p 2; 
Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   GERMAN COMPANIES SET UP INFORMATION OFFICES:  Representative 
offices of the German EuroBayernwerk and Thyssengas companies were 
officially opened in Bratislava on 29 November.  They will serve as 
"information and contact centers" for Slovak electricity and gas 
companies.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   OVERDUE SMALL-SCALE PRIVATIZATION LOANS:  In an interview for the 
tabloid NOVY CAS, Finance Minister Julius Toth rejected the charge 
that the Slovak National Bank's "conservative policy" was to blame 
for the "increasing difficulty of obtaining a bank loan."  He said 
that one of the causes of the banks' shortage of credit resources 
was the inability of many small businessmen to repay loans taken by 
them within the framework of small-scale privatization.  According 
to Toth, since the beginning of the year the volume of outstanding 
payments for small-scale privatization credits increased from Sk3 
billion to Sk38 billion.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 2 Dec 
93 p 13 AU) 

   TATRA AIR TO MEET CONDITION TO BECOME NATIONAL AIR CARRIER:  By 
adopting a new organizational structure which provides for the 
merger of Tatra Air with the Tatra Air Group, Tatra Air will meet 
the Slovak Government's condition for being awarded the status of 
national air carrier, Dusan Podhorsky, director general of the Tatra 
Air Group AS, announced.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 3 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   GERMAN FIRM TO TAKE OVER TEXTILE COMPANY:  Pavol Potocny, 
director of the Gemtex Roznava state enterprise, a manufacturer of 
ready-to-wear clothing, told the daily NARODNA OBRODA that the 
privatization commission of the Ministry of Industry had approved 
the direct sale of 100 percent of Gemtex to the German Schiesser 
holding company.  This will allow Gemtex to eliminate its debts and 
gain access to new markets through Schiesser's distribution network. 
The German firm will also secure the training of managers, the 
retraining of workers, and the supply of materials.  The takeover 
still has to be approved by the Ministry for the Administration and 
Privatization of National Property and the government's Economic 
Council.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 3 Dec 93 p 22 AU) 

   STATE TOURISM AGENCY SET UP:  On 1 November, the Slovak Ministry 
of Economy set up the SATUR (Slovak Agency for Tourism) state 
enterprise as a successor to the former CEDOK state enterprise. 
SATUR runs a network of 53 travel agencies in Slovakia and four 
abroad (Vienna, Zurich, Berlin, Budapest), which it inherited after 
the division of CEDOK's property.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 3 Dec 
93 p 3 AU) 

   INVOLUNTARY LEAVE IN ARMS FACTORY:  The Christmas holiday for the 
more than 7,000 employees of the ZTS (Heavy Engineering Works) 
Dubnica arms factory will start on 17 December, and they will not 
return to work until 10 January.  The company's growing economic 
problems are the cause of the extended holiday.  Because of cuts in 
gas deliveries caused by the company's insolvency, ZTS Dubnica had 
to suspend production in its metallurgical division at the beginning 
of November.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 4 Dec 93 p 3 AU) 

ELAG/18 January/ECONF/East Europe Division/PF 26/1636z Jan 

